


 
Product Search - Routledge
Product SearchResults for: author = Angel R. Martinez; range = all. Search again. 2 All NewAllPublishedForthcoming Product Types FeaturedTextbooksProfessional / TradeHandbooks / CompanionsResearch MonographsMajor WorksPaperbacks Direct Exploratory Data Analysis with MATLAB, Third EditionBy Wendy L. Martinez, Angel R. Martinez, Jeffrey SolkaPraise for the Second Edition:"The authors present an intuitive and easy-to-read book. … accompanied by many examples, proposed exercises, good references, and comprehensive appendices that initiate the reader unfamiliar with MATLAB."—Adolfo Alvarez Pinto, International Statistical Review 
"…Hardback – 2017-08-07  Chapman and Hall/CRCChapman & Hall/CRC Computer Science & Data AnalysisComputational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB, Third EditionBy Wendy L. Martinez, Angel R. MartinezA Strong Practical Focus on Applications and AlgorithmsComputational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB®, Third Edition covers today’s most commonly used techniques in computational statistics while maintaining the same philosophy and writing style of the bestselling previous editions. The text keeps…Hardback – 2015-12-22Chapman and Hall/CRCChapman & Hall/CRC Computer Science & Data AnalysisAdvanced SearchKeywordsTitleAuthor/EditorISBNProduct GroupanyFeaturedHandbooks / CompanionsInteractive eTextbooksLibrary / ReferenceMajor WorksPaperbacks DirectProfessional / TradeResearch MonographsSpecial Issues of JournalsStudent ReferenceTextbooksSubject CategoryanyArea StudiesArtsBehavioral SciencesBuilt EnvironmentCommunication StudiesDevelopment StudiesEconomics, Finance, Business & IndustryEducationEnvironment and SustainabilityGeographyHealth and Social CareHumanitiesInformation ScienceLanguage & LiteratureLawMedicine, Dentistry, Nursing & Allied HealthMuseum and Heritage StudiesPolitics & International RelationsReference & Information ScienceSocial SciencesSports and LeisureTourism, Hospitality and EventsUrban StudiesImprint/PublisherPublication DateanyAllNewNew/PublishedPublishedForthcoming Search









Angel R. Martinez - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Angel R. Martinez
Board Member at Tupperware Brands Corporation


View Full Profile
Are you Angel R. Martinez? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Angel R. Martinez's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Angel R. Martinez's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Angel R. Martinez's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Angel R. Martinez through your network of contacts.
												








Angel R. Martinez's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
Tupperware Brands Corporation


Past
To view Angel R. Martinez's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
61

 
 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Angel R. Martinez's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Angel R. Martinez. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Angel R. Martinez's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Angel R. Martinez's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Angel R. Martinez through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Angel R. Martinez


















Angel R. Martinez's Connections (119)





Sign up now to view Angel R. Martinez's 119 connections »









Bonita C. Stewart
Board Member, Deckers Outdoor Corporation









Lauri M. Shanahan
Board Member, Deckers Outdoor Corporation









Karyn O. Barsa
Board Member, Deckers Outdoor Corporation









M. Anne Szostak
Board Member, Dr Pepper Snapple Group, Inc.









Pablo Munoz
Former Senior Vice President and President, North America, Avon Products, Inc.









Kriss Cloninger
Dir. and President, Aflac Incorporated









John M. Gibbons
Board Member, Deckers Outdoor Corporation









Richard T. Riley
Chairman, Supervisory Board Executive Chairman, LoJack, Cimpress N.V.









Thomas M. Roehlk
Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer & Secretary, Tupperware Brands Corporation









James E. Quinn
Board Member, Deckers Outdoor Corporation








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Claiborne P. Deming
Chairman of the Board, Murphy Oil Corporation












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993

















Angel Martinez | UCLA Anderson School of Management







































Skip to main content






Apply


For Companies


Give





Home 

 > Media Relations 

 > News
 - 2010 

 > Angel Martinez


















April 26, 2010
Chairman, President & CEO of Deckers Outdoor Corporation to Deliver Commencement Address at UCLA Anderson School of Management
Angel R. Martinez is a marketing and product visionary LOS ANGELES -- UCLA Anderson School of Management today announced that Angel R. Martinez, Chairman, President & CEO of Deckers Outdoor Corporation, will address this year's MBA, Fully Employed MBA (FEMBA), and Ph.D. graduates on June 11, 2010. The ceremony will take place at 4 p.m. in Wilson Plaza on the UCLA campus.
"Angel Martinez is an inspirational leader widely known as a trend setter and expert in his field, propelling organizations to grow rapidly despite fierce global competition," said Judy Olian, dean of UCLA Anderson School of Management and John E. Anderson Chair in Management. "His entrepreneurial spirit and inclusive vision will motivate our students to pursue both success and a larger purpose in their lives."
Martinez is a marketing and product visionary with an outstanding history of launching brands and shaping future trends in the footwear industry. At Deckers Outdoor Corporation, he oversees five global footwear brands: Teva®, UGG® Australia, Simple® Shoes, Ahnu® and TSUBO® and currently serves as the company's Chairman of the Board. Martinez was named as the 2008 "Person of the Year" by Footwear News, being one of only two individuals to have received this honor twice.
Before driving innovation at Deckers, Martinez played a pivotal role in launching Keen Footwear, which was recognized in its first year of operation as REI "Vendor Partner of the Year." During his time at Keen LLC, Martinez helped secure the company's global status as a leading designer, manufacturer, marketer and distributer of performance outdoor footwear. Martinez also served as the Executive Vice President and Chief Marketing Officer of the Reebok portfolio of brands. In his 21 years with Reebok, Martinez used his entrepreneurial vision and managerial dexterity to consistently develop the company's products and image. Earlier in his career, Martinez served as President and CEO of The Rockport Company, the largest subsidiary of Reebok International Ltd. where he successfully directed the development and global implementation of a product and marketing program dedicated to broadening the brand franchise to younger consumers.
Martinez's commitment to corporate social responsibility is demonstrated through Deckers' support of numerous charitable organizations, programs and partnerships that focus on minimizing the organization's environmental footprint, as well as through the creation of a cross-functional Ethical Supply Chain team tasked with developing guidelines that govern the environmental and social practices of its business. Martinez is also a founding member of the Board of Advisors for the Reebok Human Rights Awards and currently serves on the boards of Tupperware, the Santa Barbara Museum of Natural History and the Advisory Board for UC Santa Barbara's Donald Bren School of Environmental Science and Management. Martinez is a graduate of UC Davis.
About UCLA Anderson School of ManagementUCLA Anderson School of Management, established in 1935, is regarded among the leading business schools in the world. UCLA Anderson faculty members are renowned for their teaching excellence and research in advancing management thinking. Each year, UCLA Anderson provides management education to more than 1,800 students enrolled in MBA, Fully-Employed MBA, Executive MBA, UCLA-NUS Global Executive MBA, Master of Financial Engineering, and doctoral programs, and to more than 2,000 professional managers through executive education programs. Combining highly selective admissions, varied and innovative learning programs, and a world-wide network of 36,000 alumni, UCLA Anderson develops and prepares global leaders.Contact InformationMedia Relations, (310) 206-7707, media.relations@anderson.ucla.edu







Media Relations




 Overview 




Faculty Expertise Guide




Loeb Awards




News




2017




Amgen CEO Robert A. Bradway to Deliver Commencement Address at UCLA Anderson




New Research Shows Restrictions on Pharmaceutical Salespeople’s “Detailing” Calls Reduce Physicians’ Prescribing of Detailed Drugs in Favor of Generics




Woo Greater China Business Conference at UCLA Anderson Looks at U.S.-China Relationship




Latin American Business Conference at UCLA Anderson Examines Region’s Brighter Future




UCLA Anderson Launches New Master of Science in Business Analytics




UCLA Anderson School of Management Revises Master of Financial Engineering Curriculum 




Allen Matkins/UCLA Anderson Forecast California Survey




UCLA Anderson Hosts Third CES® Conference




UCLA Anderson Forecast Reexamines the Early 
Days of the Administration





The Riordan Programs 30th Anniversary Gala




UCLA Anderson Knapp Venture Competition Winner Looks to Revolutionize Orthodontics K-POP Foods wins People’s Choice Award; two-way ties for second and third place





UCLA Anderson Forecast Expects Mild Growth
Is a recession in sight?




UCLA Anderson Celebrates 10 Years of Helping 
Veterans Become Entrepreneurs






2016




Tad Rivelle of TCW Delivers UCLA Anderson MFE Commencement Address




Dedication and Installation of “Warsaw (1943)” by Artist Robert Weingarten




UCLA Anderson School of Management Honors Retired Boeing Chairman, President and CEO W. James McNerney, Jr.




The Hartford and UCLA Anderson Forecast Launch Small Business Research Partnership




UCLA Anderson Forecast Looks at Economic Growth amid Presidential Elections




Latest Allen Matkins/UCLA Anderson Forecast California CRE Survey Questions Duration of Construction Boom




EBV Program Provides Entrepreneurship ‘Bootcamp’ Training to Post 9/11 Veterans 





UCLA Anderson School of Management Announces
2016 Gerald Loeb Award Winners





UCLA Anderson Forecast: Slowly, Steady Growth Continues




AT&T Foundation Provides $100,000 Grant to The Riordan Programs




UCLA Anderson Part-Time MBA Conference




UCLA Anderson Knapp Venture Competition Winner Kulisha Looks to Increase Food Security in Emerging Markets




Los Angeles Dodgers Foundation Provides Initial Grant to The Riordan Programs




UCLA Anderson to Host 5th Annual Investing Conference for Students and Local Investment Management Professionals 




Los Angeles Lakers General Manager Mitch Kupchak to Deliver Commencement Address at UCLA Anderson





UCLA Anderson Hosts CrEAte Conference




Woo Greater China Business Conference at UCLA Anderson 
Looks at Evolving U.S-China Relationship




Social Innovation Week Launched at UCLA Anderson




UCLA Anderson Receives Generous Donation from Bernard ('49) and Judy Briskin




UCLA Anderson Forecast: Cautious Optimism for the Nation, State and Region




Easton Technology Managemenr Center Launches Technology Leadership Summer Institute




Game Day Sports Case Competition




Latin American Business Conference




UCLA Anderson Hosting Womens Leadership Summit




UCLA Anderson to Host Pulse 2016




UCLA Anderson Launches Campuswide Entrepreneurship Accelerator 






2015




Michael Mendelson of AQR Capital Management Delivers MFE Commencement




UCLA Anderson Forecast December 2015




UCLA Anderson Hosts 2015 Big Data and Analytics Conference




UCLA Anderson Continues to Impact Head Start




UCLA Ziman Center for Real Estate Announces Major Gift




UCLA Receives Grant to Study the Effects of a Higher Minimum Wage in L.A.




30th Anniversary Celebration of the Nozawa Fellowships




New Grant for UCLA/J&J Health Care Institute




John Wooden Global Leadership Award




UCLA Anderson Forecast September 2015




Allen Matkins/UCLA Forecast Summer Survey




Entrepreneurship Bootcamp for Veterans with Disabilities




2015 Gerald Loeb Awards




Easton Technology Management Center




UCLA Anderson Forecast June 2015




EA Conference




Riordan Gala




Morrison Marketing Center




CEO Brian Cornell to Deliver Commencement




Woo Greater China Business Conference




UCLA Forecast: Entertainment Industry




UCLA Forecast March




Latin American Business Conference




The UCLA Gilbert Program




Allen Matkins Real Estate Survey




Fink Center Investing Conference






2014




Inaugural Consumer Electronics Show




Ronald Kahn Commencement Address




Rebuilding, Reinventing and Reimagining California’s Infrastructure




UCLA Forecast December




UCLA Forecast September




Barnums Donation




UCLA-NUS GEMBA 10th Anniversary




Allen Matkins/UCLA Forecast Summer Survey




EMBA and GEMBA Commencements




2014 Gerald Loeb Awards




Gender Equity Q&A




UCLA Forecast Recap




UCLA Forecast Commercial Real Estate




2014 Faculty Awards




Knapp Venture Competition Winners




Knapp Venture Competition




EA Conference




Garmaise Named Full-Time MBA Dean




Susan Wojcicki Commencement Speaker




Wilbur K. Woo Greater China Business Conference




UCLA Forecast with Eric Garcetti




UCLA Forecast - Solutions for Our City




Stock Pitch Competition




Latin American Business Conference




Entertainment that Matters




Investing Conference




Sports Case Competition




Allen Matkins/UCLA Anderson Survey






2013




MFE Commencement




TEDWomen 2013




December UCLA Anderson Forecast




Bill Cockrum Donation




John Wooden Global Leadership Award




Innovation China 2013




Riordan Programs Award




LABC Mayoral Summit




Ric Kayne Donation




INFORMS President's Award




Fink Gross Event




Banco Santander Donation




September UCLA Forecast




Allen Matkins/UCLA Anderson Commercial RE Survey




Self-Supporting Full-Time MBA Program




Summer Institute for Emerging Managers and Leaders




UCLA Forecast




Faculty Teaching Awards




Shlomo Benartzi




Knapp Venture Competition Winners




Knapp Venture Competition




Entrepreneur Association Conference




Latin American Conference




Ken Richardson




Peter Lowy




March Anderson Forecast




Woo Conference




Fink AIA Stock Pitch Competition




TED Week 2013




EDGE Program




Investing Conference




Allen Matkins/UCLA Anderson Survey




Advanced Technology Management Institute 




Hans Hufschmid Chair






2012




Loeb Call for Entries 2013




Assets Digital Launches




A Discussion of Investment Principles with Ric Kayne & Howard Marks




December Anderson Forecast




Loeb Award Changes




Fried Matching Gift Challenge




University Trading Challenge




Leamer in Chile




Wilbur K. Woo




David Pyott




Easton Gift




Edwards Gets Diaz-Alejandro Prize




Indra Nooyi




Magali Delmas




David Adelman




Matthew Emerzian




Rakesh Sarin




Amir Heshmatpour




Allen Matkins Survey




Entrepreneurship Bootcamp




Loeb Award Winners




Forecast




Faculty Awards




TED Case Challenge




Hanno Lustig




ECEWorks




YouTube AMR Team




FEMBA Flex




TED Case Challenge




UCLA Anderson Forecast




Chris Tang




Hank Wilfong




Peter Bren




Charlie Steinmetz




Loeb Award Finalists




Donor Wall




Entrepreneur Conference




Latin America Conference




Richard Rumelt




Stuti Goswamy




Rakesh Sarin




Sushil Bikhchandani




Hsu and Chow




Richard Roll




Shlomo Benartzi Op-Ed




Chris Tang




Private Equity Summit




Lonnie Ali




Woo Conference




TED Takeover




Investing Conference




Leadership Suite




Hult Global Case Challenge




Loeb Award Deadline




Historically Black Colleges




Eric Flamholtz




Mary Petersen




Private Equity Summit




Paperless Admissions




Loeb Call for Entries






2011




Bob Foster




Gonzalo Freixes




Chaffin and Stankey




Tom Epley




December Forecast




Alan Buckelew




Gross & Fink




Silver Shovel




Jim Albaugh




Nicholas Seet




Ariella Herman




One Kings Lane




Sebastian Edwards




Global Executive MBA




Margaret Shih




September Forecast




Linda Smith




Junior Achievement Day




Peter Ueberroth




Nancy Duarte




New MBA Curriculum




John Anderson




Entrepreneurship Bootcamp Veterans




Loeb Award Winners




Gary Ryals




Field Study




June Forecast




Lew Leeburg




Hispanic MBA Conference




Knapp Winners




Wooden Award




Knapp Competition




Peter Ueberroth




Loeb Award Finalists




Anderson Gift




Team Dyesol




Nancy Adler




Raj Iyengar




Steve Mollencamp




100 Inspirational Alumni




David Lewin




Forecast




Sanford Sigoloff




Endowed Chair




Kenneth Venner




Bob McCann




Keith Leonard




Kathy Ullrich




Loeb Deadline Extended




Paul E. Green Award




Dr. Kathy Magliato




Jonathan Greenblatt




Loeb Call for Entries






2010




Commencement




UCLA Anderson Forecast




Eddie Ma




Silver Shovel




Ariella Herman




School Feeding




La Ola Social




100 Points of Impact




Financial Access at Birth




UCLA-UAI Global Executive MBA for the Americas




Doing Business in Korea 2010




Management Development Institute




Francis Longstaff




Ben Sharp




Stacey Bryant




Hanno Lustig




Sunil Rajaraman




GAP Launch




EMBA Commencement




Burning Question




Regina Regazzi




Big 5




Forecast




John Wooden




Knapp Finals




Sheila Choi




Saudi Arabian General Investment Authority




Loeb Finalists




Joan Amble




Career Fair




Entrepreneurs Conference




Larry Fink




Center for International Business Education & Research




California Clean Innovation Conference




Dart Container




Entrepreneurs Conference




Consortium




Sood & Stengel



Angel Martinez



Entrepreneurship Bootcamp for Veterans




Erica Marie Colon




Golden Briefcase




Alex Lawrence




Global Access Program




Distinguished Speaker




Frederick W. Smith




Forecast




Woo Conference




One Thread




Burt Swanson




Sterling Lanier




Energy Case Competition




Kim Campbell




Bill Cockrum




Randy Horn




Ceridian UCLA Index




Richard Roll




Stephen Covey




MEMES Week




T. K. Pillan




Applied Management Research Program




Gene Rosenfeld




Ali Kermani




Chris Tang




PepsiCo




Sanford Jacoby




Deloitte




Bill Ouchi




Dr. Susan Love




Loeb Award Call for Entries




Peter Marino






2009




Jim Farley




Creative Services




Craig Fox




Dan Candela




Master of Financial Engineering




John Fogelman




Bill Ouchi




David Geffen




Al Osborne




Mark Zoradi




Forecast




IS Associates




Mitch Kupchak




Scripped




Taco Bell




Todd Maclin




Kyle Martin




Jim Matheson




Cheng Si-Wei




Rakesh Sarin




Sabrina Simmons




Mt. Kilimanjaro




Dominique Hanssens




Victor Tabbush




William Sharpe




UCLA - NUS Global EMBA Program




EBV




J. Fred Weston




Brian Farrell




Felipe Caro




Loeb Awards




MDI Program




Jim Stengel




Economic Outlook




EA Conference




Knapp Competition




Teaching Awards




AMR




Barbara Lawrence




Legacy Case Competition




Loeb Finalists




John Wooden Award




Easton Classroom




Forecast




Climate Change




Paul Otellini




Freeman Dyson




Anne Sweeney




Same-Sex Marriage




Ariella Herman




CACI




Shruti Bhat




Golden Briefcase




Executive Compensation




Global Business Leadership Conference




Sanford Jacoby




Riordan Honors




Entrepreneurship Week




USA Today




Mortgage Symposium




Conference




Forecast




Aimee Drolet




Al Osborne




Stefan Jacoby




NICC




Ariella Herman




Head Start




Survive, Thrive




Ph.D. Program




Jerry Nickelsburg




Ziman Gift




Woo Conference




Bruce Carlin




Project ECHO




Jim Easton




Real Estate Survey




Deloitte




EEP Panel




Quantum




Michael Oxley






2008




Holiday Closure




Bodapati




One Stop Shop




Forecast




ODEP




IS Associates




AMR




Harold Williams




Silver Shovel




EMMI Workshop




Muthulingam




Don Morrison




Real Estate Symposium




OC Outlook




BTAP




Miguel Unzueta




Accelerate Campaign




Salvador Viramontes




Two Term Chairs




UCLA - NUS




Hanno Lustig




Richard Heckmann EBV




Easton Classroom




Entrepreneurial Bootcamp




Fastsoft




Judson Caskey




2008 Gerald Loeb Awards




Howard Schultz




Don Morrison




Entertainment & Media Program




CEIBS Competition




Teaching Awards




Riordan Programs Graduation




Kumar Rajaram




Riordan Programs




John Wooden Global Leadership Award




Entrepreneurial Bootcamp




Microfinance




CityMedia Wins Knapp Prize




CACI Conference




Knapp Venture Competition




Comedy Network




Financial Engineering




Loeb Finalists 2008




Financial Times




Carissa Phelps




Fink Gift




California Clean Innovation




Golden Briefcase




HCI Reunion




Al Osborne




Fred Weston




Mae Shores




Winners of Global Business Leadership Competition




Sam Culbert




Global Business Leadership Conference




T.K. Pillan




US News & World Report




Warning for Small Investors




Best Paper Prizes




Woo Conference




Project ECHO




Bill Cockrum




Forecast




Master of Financial Engineering




Woo Conference




Brian Farrell




Nestle Case Competition




Uday Karmarkar




Bill Gross ('71) Gift




Deloitte Competition




FT Rankings




Project ECHO




Sara Tucker






2007




Board of Visitors




Melissa Karz




Kenyan Entrepreneur




David Snow




UCLA Anderson Forecast




Strike Impact




Rick Fedrizzi




Real Estate Challenge




Disabilities Leadership Institute




Steve LeVine




Berkeley Case Competition




Richard Saouma




HCI




Kelly Bean




Muhammad Yunus




Felipe Caro




Al Osborne




Mark Leets




September Economic Outlook




Ed Leamer




UCLA - NUS Global Executive MBA Program Goes Global




Charles Corbett




BIT Book




Fast Money MBA Challenge




Pat Hughes




Ralph Boulware




CREW-LA Wine Tasting




Olian Named Chair of AACSB




Stuart Gabriel




Jennifer Openshaw




2007 Loeb Awards




Teaching Awards




Alternative Assets Conference




Peter Odebjer




Mike Hanssens Wins O'Dell Award




Knapp Venture Competition




Loeb Finalists




Dr. Darvish




Executive Education Ranking




CEO Exchange




Mike Kusunoki




Global Entertainment Executive Program




Director's Training Program




CIBER Conference




Sally Choi




Solutions for Our City




UCLA J&J HCI




Cathy Le




New York R.O.I. '07




International Career Fair




Stuart Gabriel




Cathy Sandeen




Bill Pierskalla




Global Consulting Challenge




Faye Walsh




Toby Moskowitz




Deloitte Case Competition




ECHO Business Plan Competition




Woo Conference




Financial Times Ranking




Northrop Grumman




Woo China Conference




Bill Ouchi




Asset Allocation Research






2006




Holiday Closure




Investors Reward Transparency




December Forecast




IS Associates Leadership Award




Microfinance




Marcus Castain




Kathryn Ullrich




HIV/AIDS Care




#1 in Intellectual Capital




Jay Ferguson




Wachovia Bank




UCLA Anderson Forecast




Daniel Petrocelli




Kip Hagopian Receives Distinguished Alumni Award




Program for Minority Entrepreneurs




J&J Health Care Executive Program




New Faculty




Bendersky Receives Best Paper Prize




Jason Frand Retires




Riordan Programs Host MBA Admissions Conference




2006 Loeb Award Winners




Summer 2006 Forecast




Teaching Awards




Walt Torous




DFJ Venture Challenge




Knapp Competition




CIBER Grant




Jamie McCourt on Leadership




Knapp Venture Competition




John E. Bryson to speak at Commencement




Executive Ed Programs




2006 Gerald Loeb Award Finalists Announced by UCLA Anderson School of Management




John Matise Named COO




Sandra Loder Named CIO




Hugh Jackson Heads Golden Boy Partners




Bernardo Promoted to Professor




McCardle Honored for Community Work




U.S. News & World Report




Riordan Programs Receive $70,000




Longstaff Best Paper Award




R.O.I. '06




Case Wizards Take Deloitte Contest




Pierskalla Receives INFORMS Award




Financial Times 2006 MBA Rankings - UCLA Anderson 13th in U.S.




Riordan Programs 20th Anniversary




Tad Rivelle ('90)




UCLA Anderson Welcomes Dean Judy Olian






2005




Dawna Stone Selected as Apprentice




Marvin Lieberman's First Mover Advantage




CEO Exchange




Nozawa Fellowship




Sandy Jacoby's Book




Ziman Center




Bart Bronnenberg Receives Little Award




Princeton Review




Alison Brown




September Forecast




B-school rankings




Judy Olian Named Dean




Grinblatt Awarded LaForce Chair




Forbes List of Best Business Schools




Latino Focused Forecast Conference




Ariella Herman Study




Stewart Resnick to Speak at EMBA Commencement




J&J 1000th Graduate




PhD Student Placement




Art Geoffrion Receives Honorary Doctorate




Summer Forecast




Loeb Winners 2005




AMR Announces Award Winners




Riordan Programs




C.K. Prahalad Describes India as Laboratory for Innovation




Fiat Lux survey




Knapp Winners




Knapp




Hanssens




Loeb Finalists 2005




ELM Follow up




MA Case Competition




Ziman Conference




Euro Conference




Jack Welch Winning




Rice Business Plan Competition




Ted Andersen




Honeywell Challenge




Roll - Graham Award




US News Rankings




Loeb Judging




March Forecast




Deloitte Case Competition




Subra




Walt Mossberg




Aimee Drolet and Shi Zhang




Ely Dahan




March Forecast




Wozniak




Forecast Honored




Commencement Speaker




Money Magazine




Financial Times Rankings




Marschak Lecture




Jeff Henley - Distinguished Alumnus






2004




Elwin Svenson




Kelly Perdew




EMMI Walter Zifkin




Bank of America Gift




December Forecast




#1 in Intellectual Capital




Information Sessions




Ziman - Times Square Roulette




Elite Eight Brand Competition




NUS Info Session




Global Window




Part-Time MBA Conference




Maia Young Joins Faculty




Business Week Rankings




Kumar Rajaram




National Recruitment Forum for Doctoral Programs




UCLA Anderson Featured in Business School Surveys




Sebastian Edwards Appointed To Governor's Economic Council




Alumni Weekend 2004




Gift by Bruce and Gretchen Willison will Ensure Academic Excellence




UCLA Ziman Center For Real Estate Forecasts Continued Strength For Southern California Apartments




UCLA Anderson Forecast Reveals California Growth Continues Despite Looming State Budget Issues




David Lewin EMBA Teaching Award




UCLA-NUS Inaugural




Entertainment & Media Management Institute




Doctoral Grads




Trueman Research




Five Members Added to Board of Visitors




Investment Expert Joan Payden to Keynote EMBA Commencement




Ariella Herman Making A Difference




Gerald Loeb Awards Winners




Alex Lawrence




Forecast Looks For Return to Normal




Campaign Anderson's Commitment to Faculty




Robert Eckert of Mattel Shares Insight with Class of 2004




Parker CMC Receives $1M




AMR Awards Announced




Faculty Excellence




J&J Continues Funding




GAP Window




Legacy Case Competition




GCBA Opportunities




ELC Case Competition




Knapp Winners




Entrepreneurs Evolve!




Director Training Certification




SBC Grant




Dawna Stone




Loeb Awards Finalists




Knapp Venture Competition




Daniel Kahneman Offers New Metrics for Quality of Life




Real Estate Challenge VII




Head Start Study




Ziman First Annual Conference




US News Survey




UCLA Forecast Modest Growth




Lawrence Promoted




Loeb Prelim Judging




MBA Curriculum




Sorenson Tenure




New Forecast Team




FT Survey Faculty Top 10




Governance Conference




FEMBA Students Help Start-Ups




Karmarkar Award




Loeb Call For Entries




Digital Gender Gap




Hanssens Marschak






2003




Loeb New Final Judges




IS Associates ELM




UCLA Anderson Forecast: California Job Growth




FEMBA Students in NZ




Janis Forman wins ABC Publication Award




Brand Management Competition




Mike Tonsing




Mark Grinblatt




Pedro Santa-Clara




Doctoral Graduates




Financial Times: EMBA




Brett Trueman




UCLA Anderson Faculty in Top 10




Business Week: EMBA




Leadership Key to Ethics




Forbes: MBA




Director Training




Leadership Foundation




Making Schools Work




UCLA Anderson Forecast: 9/2003




Ziman Real Estate Forecast




Francis Longstaff




George Geis EMBA




Ziman Real Estate Multi-Family Forecast




NUS




Eric Mokover




David Lewin: Senior Associate Dean




Elaine Hagan: Price Center Director




Sebastian Edwards: Chinese Currency




Susan Schroeder




Raghuram Rajan




James Q. Wilson - Pres. Medal of Freedom




Uday Karmarkar




Jeffrey Cole: FCC Ownership Rules




Al Osborne: Named Senior Associate Dean




2003 Loeb Awards




2003 Commencement




Dan Mitchell: California Budget Crisis




Charles Corbett: Granted tenure




UCLA Anderson Forecast: 6/5/2003




Johnson & Johnson: "Train the Trainers" Conference




2003 Abe Ackerman Award




Avanidhar Subrahmanyam




Price Center Receives SBC Grant




2003 Knapp Venture Competition: Winners




2003 Knapp Venture Competition: Final Round




2003 Loeb Award Finalists




Ziman & Forecast Present Conference




2003 Riordan Program Concludes




2003 Galef Symposium




2003 Latin American Business Association Conference




National Black MBA Association Competition




Price Center $1,000,000 Challenge




Anderson Ranked 14th by U.S. News & World Report




Steve Forbes Speaks at Anderson




Corporate Governance Conference




Former Senator Gary Hart Speaks at Anderson




Anderson 2nd at Venture Capital Competition




2003 Preliminary Loeb Judging




Edward Leamer: Wall Street Journal Forecaster




2003 Anderson Forecast Agenda




Anderson Alumni Present Gary Hart




Anderson 2nd at USC Marshall Competition




Anderson Ranks 3rd Worldwide




UCLA Internet Project Report




Stephen Unger Speaks at Anderson




Anderson Welcomes Caprice Young




Anderson 1st in Entrepreneurship




Ronald W. Dollens Speaks at Anderson




Sebastian Edwards: Washington Blind to Brazil




Richard Roll: Nicholas Molodovsky Award Recipient




Head Start Partners with Johnson & Johnson




AT&T Gives $50,000 Grant for Research




Anderson Accredited by ISS




2003 Loeb Awards Call for Entries




INFORMS Bestows Three Fellowships at Anderson






2002




UCLA Anderson Appoints Alumna As Its New Director of Alumni Relations




Knapp Venture Competition Holds Alumni Mixer to Launch its Annual Contest




GAP International Venture Forum 2002 Company Profiles




UCLA Anderson Presents Distinguished Executive Leadership Award




Helping New Zealand High Tech Firms Expand Their Reach to the United States




UCLA Anderson Forecast Still Predicting Short-term Sluggishness




Employment Concerns are Paramount, but Spending Continues on Homes, Cars




Start-up Firms Vie for Funding at International Venture Forum




Effective Behavioral Prescription to Increase Employee Savings




GAP International Venture Forum 2002 Schedule




UCLA Anderson Forecast Conference to Examine Outlook for Globalization




Grads Return to Campus to Reconnect with Anderson and Old Friends; Fundraising Efforts Hits New High




UCLA Anderson Participates in Inaugural NUS-SID Conference on Corporate Governance




Thousands Gather For the First-Ever West Coast Business Leadership Conference




Scholar From  UCLA Anderson Awarded Harold Larnder Prize




CNN's Lou Dobbs Brings his Influential "Moneyline" Show to The Anderson School




UCLA Anderson and Doshisha Management School




West Coast Business Leadership Conference




PricewaterhouseCoopers Endows Faculty Fellowship in Accounting at UCLA Anderson




UCLA Anderson Forecast Expects Slight Improvement in California Economy; National Forecast Indicates Continued Sluggish Growth




UCLA Anderson Forecast Explains That California's Infrastructure Needs An "Intensive Margin"




First Southern California-Wide Multi-Family Housing Forecast




Ziman Center's Fourth Annual Multi-Family Housing Conference Expands to Examine Entire Southern California Area




UCLA Professor Receives Coveted J.D.C. Little Award




UCLA Anderson Celebrates Achievements: John E. Anderson Receives Distinguished Alumni Award




UCLA Anderson Forecast To Examine Impending Issues Affecting California Infrastructure




UCLA Anderson Forecast is Among the Most Accurate for its National and California Predictions




Ziman Center for Real Estate at The Anderson School Holds Fourth-Annual Multi-Family Housing Forecast Conference




CIBER Announces Pre-Contest Winners of Economist/Shell Writing Prize Competition




UCLA Anderson Hosts Outreach Activities with Leaders of the Society of Hispanic Professional Engineers




UCLA Anderson Appoints New Chair and Vice Chair




Professor at UCLA Anderson is Bestowed with Highest Honor In Marketing Education




Faculty Members Promoted at UCLA Anderson




The Gerald Loeb Awards Winners Announced by UCLA Anderson




The Riordan Programs Celebrates 15th Anniversary




UCLA Anderson Forecast Expects Sluggish Growth for the Nation Throughout 2002




UCLA Anderson Forecast Survey Shows That Burden of Health Care Costs Will Continue to Fall on Employees




UCLA Anderson Climbs in the Financial Times' Executive Education Rankings




UCLA Releases MBA Program Application Data for Class of 2002




Recipients of Anderson School Staff Excellence Award Named




Health Care Training for Parents




2002 Knapp Business Plan Competition




UCLA Anderson Forecast Will Tackle Health Care Crisis at June Conference




$1.4 million Grant from the U.S. Department of Education




Eli Broad Shares His Philosophy of Business and Leadership




MBA Students Vie for Dollars in Business Plan Competition




Exemplary Leadership in Management Award




Forces Altering the Business of Hollywood




UCLA Anderson Forecasters




Two-Day Information Economy Conference




The Gerald Loeb Award Finalists




Entertainment in the L.A. Economy




Professor Emeritus J. Fred Weston Honored




Multi-Family Symposium




Library Exhibit Spotlights Professor Morrison




Financial Times Survey of Top 100




UCLA Galef Symposium




Mini-MBA Certificate Program






2001




Student Investment Fund




Effects of Terrorist Attacks and Negligible Long-Term National Impact




International Start-up Firms




Forecast Celebrates 50 Years




50 Years and Going Strong




Toyota U.S. Chief Sees Challenges Ahead for Auto Industry




Robert Williams, UCLA Anderson Professor and Forecast Founder




Declines in E-Commerce, Major Concerns About Online Privacy and Credit Card Security




Top 20 Tech-Savviest Business Schools




Three New Members to Board of Visitors




Computerworld's Top 25 Techno-MBAs




Highest Among Public Universities in BusinessWeek's EMBA Rankings




Blast of Creativity to Fire Up Their Business Edge




UCLA Anderson Places First in National Black MBA Association's Student Case Competition




Rockwell A. Schnabel Named U.S. Ambassador to the European Union




Open House for Executive Education Leadership Institutes




Economic Impact of Terrorist Attacks




Short-Term Slowdown in Multi-Family Housing Market




US Economy "on the Verge of Recession;" California Faces Major Slowdown




$10 Million to Launch Ziman Center for Real Estate




Do not Kill the Bosses




Professor Garners AMA Lifetime Achievement Award




UCLA Anderson Faculty Member Wins Zellner Award




UCLA Anderson Gives Entrepreneurs Competitive Edge Through "Mini-MBA" Certificate Program




Adjusting in the Post-Net World




2001 Reunion Class Gift Campaign Raises A Record-Breaking $627,533




Multi-Family Housing Forecast Conference on Sept. 13




UCLA Anderson Author Examines Digital Deals




UCLA Anderson MBA Graduates Favor Traditional Business Sectors




UCLA Anderson Forecasters Predict 80% Chance of National Recession




UCLA Anderson Honors its 60th Graduating Class




The UCLA Anderson Forecast and CERA to Detail Economic Impacts




Dominic Ng of UCLA Anderson's Board of Visitors Named Entrepreneur of the Year in Financial Services




UCLA Anderson Teams with Education Office to Bring Management Training to Head Start Programs in Los Angeles County




UCLA Anderson Faculty, Students Provide High-Level Management Training for Head Start Directors Across the Nation




UCLA Anderson 2001 Ph.D. Graduates Receive Academic Appointments




UCLA Anderson Holds 'Real Options' Conference, July 13-14




Winners and Finalists Loeb Competition and the Recipient of the Lifetime Achievement Award are Announced by UCLA Anderson




UCLA Anderson Appoints Richard Rodner to Lead Marketing/Communications Programs




UCLA Anderson to Provide Management Training to Head Start Directors




Chairman and Founder of Global Crossing Ltd. Will Deliver Commencement Address to MBAs at UCLA Anderson




UCLA Anderson Author Examines Career Burnout and How to Rekindle the Flame of Passion at Work




UCLA Anderson's Forecast Will Examine Energy Deregulation in California and its Economic Implications




UCLA Anderson Welcomes Two New Board Members




Dean Willison Responds to Wall Street Journal Report




UCLA Anderson Places Among Top Ten Business Schools for High Technology




UCLA Forecasters See National Recession as Inevitable in 2001; California Will Not Be Immune, With Bay Area Very Susceptible




Scholarly Journal Names UCLA Anderson Professor Recipient Of Prestigious Marketing Award








Media Contacts












Related Links


Visit the 2010 Commencement Web Site














For Visitors


campus tour


maps & directions


master calendar


facility use




For Companies


recruit an mba


post a job


consulting teams


for GAP companies




For the News Media


media relations


ucla anderson forecast


anderson in the news


faculty directory


faculty directory (pdf)


fact sheet






directory


site index


portal


library


UCLA


feedback


© UC Regents


































Angel R. Martinez - Chairman, CEO & President, Deckers Brands - UC Davis Graduate School of Management
















Skip to main content





UC Davis Graduate School of Management
UC Davis Graduate School of Management




Menu






























MBA - Full-Time
MBA - Part-Time (Bay Area)
MBA - Part-Time (Sacramento)
MPAc - Accounting
MSBA - Business Analytics
Accounting Minor (Undergraduate)
Technology Management Minor (Undergraduate)
Executive Education
Institute for Innovation and Entrepreneurship
Faculty and Research



About Our School, News
School Blog
Recruit, Partner, MBA Consulting
Current Students
Alumni
Giving Back








 

Tools

Alumni Directory
Course Schedule & Registration (RAPS)
Manage Your Application
MBA Focus (Career Development)
Support (Student, Faculty, Staff)


 











More options



 
 







 
 
 



Back to Previous Page
Visit Us
Connect
Apply


 








 


Distinguished Speaker 


Angel R. Martinez – Chairman, CEO & President, Deckers Brands

"Leadership: What Got You Here Won’t Get You There"



October 7, 2014 - 7:00pm - 8:00pm 


“Leadership: What Got You Here Won’t Get You There”

Event Details
Tuesday, October 7, 2014

“The most effective leaders lead through a highly developed sense of compassion and empathy. Only when people truly believe that you understand their real needs and are committed to seeing those needs met can you begin to harness the power of the collective genius that is at the core of every organization’s potential.” – Angel R. Martinez

Leading the Way
Angel R. Martinez is a leader in product marketing, innovation and future trends. He has served as chairman of the board of Deckers Brands since 2008 and as CEO and president since 2005. Deckers designs, markets and distributes footwear, apparel and accessories, including UGG Australia, Teva, HOKA ONE ONE and Ahnu brands.
Martinez co-founded Keen LLC in 2003 and served as chairman of the board, CEO and president. He was one of the founders of Reebok, where he went on to hold senior positions, including president and CEO of The Rockport Co., one of Reebok’s largest subsidiaries. Martinez is a director of Tupperware Brands Corp. He received his B.A. from the UC Davis College of Letters and Science in 1977.
  





 
 








Related Links
Add to Cal Martinez interviewed on CNBC's "Mad Money" 
 



 








Log in



E-mail or username: *



Password: *



 Remember me


Request new password




 

Commands


Help
Log in


 















 




Computational Statistics Handbook With Matlab - Martinez, Wendy L./ Martinez, Angel R. - 9781584882299 | HPB









HPBYour favorite local bookstore.Everywhere.ClickSign up / Log inHelp0Your cartLooks like there are no items in here.  Start shopping now and add treasures to your cart. If you have items saved in your cart, sign in to your account to pick up where you left off. Sign in to your accountBrowse Best SellersBooks Popular subjectsYoung Adult FictionChildren's FictionReligionHistoryBiography & AutobiographySee All CategoriesCustomer favoritesBestsellersNew ReleasesBox SetsStaff PicksHPB BlogSuperbuysUnder $10Under $5Under $4Under $3Under $2Under $1Must HaveThe Hottest Book This WeekShop BestsellersMovies & TV Popular subjectsFamilyAction/AdventureTelevision: HBOTelevision: SeriesWesternsTelevision: Discovery ChannelTelevision: British Mystery/DrTelevision: BBCChristmasCustomer favoritesBest selling moviesNew releasesBlu RayBooks turned into moviesKids and familyAnimeBoxed SetsSuperbuysUnder $5Under $4Under $3Under $2Under $1Good for a LaughThe Top Comedy of the WeekShop ComediesMusic Popular subjectsCountry & WesternPopular MusicMystery/SuspenseJuvenile Grades 4-6 Ages 9-11Jazz MusicSoul/R&BSoundtracks & ScoresRomance/ModernDiet & NutritionCustomer favoritesBest selling musicNew releasesBest selling vinylKids and familyMovie soundtracksBoxed setsSuperbuysUnder $5Under $4Under $3Under $2Under $1Teen under $5Kids under $5New TunesThe Top Album of the WeekShop New MusicTextbooks Popular subjectsInternational EditionsSell Us Your TextbooksHomeschoolStudy GuidesCliffs NotesCareerRare Finds BooksSigned BooksFirst EditionsBoxed SetsBrowse Rare FindsMoviesCollectors EditionsBoxed SetsVinylPre 19501950-19541955-19591960-19641965-19691970-NowSuperbuysRare under $10Rare under $5New treasures on our shelvesStart collecting todayShop Rare FindsGift Cards Our Story20% off your online order! GET DETAILSClickFIND A STOREComputational Statistics Handbook With Matlabby Martinez, Wendy L./ Martinez, Angel R.Approaching computational statistics through its theoretical aspects can be daunting. Often intimidated or distracted by the theory, researchers and students can lose sight of the actual goals and applications of the subject. What they need are its key concepts, an understanding of its methods, experience with its implementation, and practice with computational software.Focusing on the computational aspects of statistics rather than the theoretical, Computational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB uses a down-to-earth approach that makes statistics accessible to a wide range of users. The authors integrate the use of MATLAB throughout the book, allowing readers to see the actual implementation of algorithms, but also include step-by-step procedures to allow implementation with any suitable software. The book concentrates on the simulation/Monte Carlo point of view, and contains algorithms for exploratory data analysis, modeling, Monte Carlo simulation, pattern recognition, bootstrap, classification, cross-validation methods, probability density estimation, random number generation, and other computational statistics methods.Emphasis on the practical aspects of statistics, details of the latest techniques, and real implementation experience make the Computational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB more than just the first book to use MATLAB to solve computational problems in statistics. It also forms an outstanding, introduction to statistics for anyone in the many disciplines that involve data analysis.Computer Science, GeneralCondition: --HPB condition ratingsNew: Item is brand new, unused and unmarked, in flawless condition.Fine/Like New (F): No defects, little usage. May show remainder marks. Older books may show minor flaws.Very Good (VG): Shows some signs of wear and is no longer fresh. Attractive. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Good (G): Average used book with all pages present. Possible loose bindings, highlighting, cocked spine or torn dust jackets. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Fair (FR): Obviously well-worn, but no text pages missing. May be without endpapers or title page. Markings do not interfere with readability. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Poor (P): All text is legible but may be soiled and have binding defects. Reading copies and binding copies fall into this category. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Conditions GuideFormat: HardcoverSold by: --Language: EnglishPublisher: Chapman & HallISBN-13: 9781584882299ISBN: 1584882298Publication Year: 2001HPB pick - Out of stockLoading...Loading marketplace...HPB condition ratingsNew: Item is brand new, unused and unmarked, in flawless condition.Fine/Like New (F): No defects, little usage. May show remainder marks. Older books may show minor flaws.Very Good (VG): Shows some signs of wear and is no longer fresh. Attractive. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Good (G): Average used book with all pages present. Possible loose bindings, highlighting, cocked spine or torn dust jackets. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Fair (FR): Obviously well-worn, but no text pages missing. May be without endpapers or title page. Markings do not interfere with readability. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Poor (P): All text is legible but may be soiled and have binding defects. Reading copies and binding copies fall into this category. Used textbooks do not come with supplemental materials.Conditions GuideHPB condition ratingsNew: Mint condition or still sealed (SS). Absolutely perfect in every way. New.Fine/Like New (EX): No defects, little sign of use, well cared for. Plays perfectly. Close to new. Not necessarily sealed or unused, but close. Could be an unopened promotional or cut item. Sometimes called: mint-minus.Very Good (VG): Will show some signs that it was played and otherwise handled by a previous owner who took good care of it.Good (G): Attractive and well cared for, but no longer fresh. Minor signs of wear, scuffing or scratching, but will play almost perfectly. For vinyl: barely detectable crackles or pops.Fair (FR): This item is in okay condition. For vinyl: good is not so good and the record may have low level crackles or pops when playing. CD: one or more tracks may skip.Poor (P): Obviously well-worn and handled. Most vinyl collectors will not buy good or below, but some tracks on CD or vinyl will play.Conditions GuideHPB condition ratingsNew: This movie is unopened and brand new.Fine/Like New (EX): Near new. No defects, little sign of use. Plays perfectly. Not necessarily sealed or unused, but close. No skipping; no fuzzy or snowy frames in VHS.Very Good (VG): Attractive and well cared for but no longer fresh. Minor signs of wear, but will play almost perfectly. For VHS: barely detectable distortion or very few fuzzy or snowy frames.Good (G): This item is in okay condition and basically works well. There may be some minor distortion on VHS tape; slight scratching or wear on DVD.Fair (FR): Basically plays, but may be obviously well-worn with some scratching or tape distortion.Poor (P): Disc or tape is intact, but may be scratched or stretched. There may be skips or distortion or product defects.Conditions Guide×



	Board of Directors – Tupperware Brands Corporation





























skip to main content





































About Us
Social Good
Investors
News
Careers




Investor Relations HomeInvestor StoryFinancial InformationCorporate GovernanceStock InformationNews and EventsIR Resources





Investor Relations HomeInvestor Story
Business ModelStrategyDiversified Portfolio
Financial Information
Quarterly and Annual ReportsFact SheetKey RatiosForeign Exchange ImpactSEC Filings
Corporate Governance
Board of DirectorsManagementGovernance Documents
Stock Information
Stock Quote and GraphHistorical Price Look-upTotal Return CalculatorCost Basis CalculatorDividend HistoryAnalyst Coverage
News and Events
Press ReleasesEvents and Presentations
IR Resources
Investor FAQEmail AlertsRequest Printed MaterialsInvestor ContactRSS Feeds





Investor Relations HomeInvestor Story
Business ModelStrategyDiversified Portfolio
Financial Information
Quarterly and Annual ReportsFact SheetKey RatiosForeign Exchange ImpactSEC Filings
Corporate Governance
Board of DirectorsManagementGovernance Documents
Stock Information
Stock Quote and GraphHistorical Price Look-upTotal Return CalculatorCost Basis CalculatorDividend HistoryAnalyst Coverage
News and Events
Press ReleasesEvents and Presentations
IR Resources
Investor FAQEmail AlertsRequest Printed MaterialsInvestor ContactRSS Feeds















A global leader
A marketer of innovative, premium products across multiple brands utilizing a relationship-based selling method through an independent sales force.











Board of DirectorsManagementGovernance Documents












            Board of Directors
          


E. V. (Rick) Goings 




E. V. (Rick) Goings 
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer since October 1997



Catherine A. Bertini




Catherine A. Bertini
Vice Chair and Professor of Public Administration and International Affairs at the Maxwell School of Syracuse University



Susan M. Cameron




Susan M. Cameron
Non-Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors of Reynolds American Inc.



Kriss Cloninger, III




Kriss Cloninger, III
President
AFLAC, Incorporated (AFLAC)
Mr. Cloninger also serves as a director of AFLAC, Inc. and Total Systems Services, Inc.



Meg Crofton




Meg Crofton
Retired President  Walt Disney Parks & Resorts Operations, U.S. & France for The Walt Disney Company.



Angel R. Martinez




Angel R. Martinez
Chairman of the Board of Deckers Outdoor Corporation



Antonio Monteiro de Castro




Antonio Monteiro de Castro
Retired, Chief Operating Officer, British American Tobacco



David R. Parker




David R. Parker
Chief Operating Officer
The Archstone Partnerships



Richard T. Riley




Richard T. Riley
Retired Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of LoJack Corporation. Mr. Riley also serves on the boards of Dorman Products, Inc. and Cimpress/VistaPrint N.V.



Joyce M. Roché




Joyce M. Roché
Author and Retired President and Chief Executive Officer of the Girls, Incorporated 
Ms. Roché serves as a director of AT&T Inc., Dr. Pepper Snapple Group and Macy’s Inc.



M. Anne Szostak




M. Anne Szostak
President and Chief Executive Officer of Szostak Partners
Ms. Szostak serves as a director of Dr. Pepper Snapple Group and IDEXX Laboratories, Inc.





For confidential and anonymous communications, you may contact the Board of Directors by writing to:
Board of Directors
Tupperware Brands Corporation
Post Office Box 2353
Orlando, Florida 32802-2353
USA
Or, via email using our online form.
If preferred, you may contact the board utilizing a 24-hour, confidential hotline, staffed by multi-lingual professionals, available through an independent company called The Network.
The hotline numbers are:
U.S. & Canada (toll free): 877-217-6220
All other locations (call collect): +1 770-582-5215










              Financial Information
            




                    Latest Reports
                  

 1Q 2017 Webcast 
1Q 2017 Earnings Release 
1Q Earnings Release Presentation 


                        All Reports
                      





                    SEC Filings
                  

Jul20Current report filingJul05Statement of Changes in Beneficial Ownership


                        All SEC Filings
                      





                    Stock Price
                  



                        Stock Information
                      









      Contacts
    



          Tupperware Brands Corporation 
        

14901 S. Orange Blossom Trail Orlando, FL, 32837 
407.826.5050




          Investor Relations
        

James Hunt
Assistant Controller andDirector of Investor Relations
407.826.4475 
jameshunt@tupperware.com




          Transfer Agent
        

Wells Fargo 
Shareowner Services 
PO Box 64854 
St. Paul, MN, 55164-0854 
800.468.9716stocktransfer@wellsfargo.com







                Download Fact Sheet
              











Youtube
Instagram
Facebook
Twitter



Policies
Contact Us


















Epinions.com: Read expert reviews on Books computational statistics handbook with matlab by angel r martinez and wendy l martinez 2007 hardcover revised


























Home
Digital Cameras
Tablets & eReaders
Televisions
Home & Garden Appliances
Computers
Electronics
Sports & Outdoor
Toys
Kids & Baby Gear
Movies
Books
Music


























Price Low To High
Price High To Low
Relevance





Filter Results
Sort By









                               		Chapman and Hall/CRC Computer Science and Data Analysis: Computational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB, Third Edition 22 by Angel R. Martinez and Wendy L. Martinez (2015, Hardcover, Revised) 

                               
 From $25.95

A Strong Practical Focus on Applications and AlgorithmsComputational Statistics Handbook with MATLAB(r), Third Edition covers today s most commonly used techniques in computational statistics while ma...









Handbook for Healing by Charles Hunter and Frances Gardner Hunter (2001, Paperback, Revised, Expanded) 

                               
 From $5.99
  1 reviews


Can God really use me?Amazement! That is the reaction of many who have experienced the power of God while praying for healing for the sick. Charles and Frances Hunter have discovered the keys to heali...








                           			Matlab: An Introduction With Applications 

                           		
$92.23 at eBay
MATLAB: An Introduction with Applications Product Features Product Description On Jun-22-17 at 14:56:08 PDT, seller added the following information:













                               		The Presbyterian Handbook, Revised Edition (2016, Paperback) 

                               
 From $13.49

"The Presbyterian Handbook, Revised Edition" provides historical and up to date theological information about Presbyterian beliefs alongside fun-filled facts and practical tips on being a churchgoing ...









                               		Leadership Handbook of Management and Administration (2008, Paperback, Revised) 

                               
 From $19.99
  1 reviews


This substantial resource offers pastors and church leaders practical insight into the daily issues of running a church. Conceived and compiled by the editors of Leadership journal, this book covers t...









                               		New Christian's Handbook : Everything Believers Need to Know by Max Anders (2011, Paperback) 

                               
 From $10.99

A guide to the whats, whys, and hows of the Christian faith for new believers. Well-respected pastor Max Anders helps ground new Christians in the faith. Thirty-six, easy to follow chapters deepen you...








                           			Matlab: An Introduction With Applications 

                           		
$92.23 at eBay
MATLAB: An Introduction with Applications Product Features Product Description







                               		What the Bible Is All About: What the Bible Is All about NIV : Bible Handbook by Henrietta C. Mears (2016, Paperback, Revised) 

                               
 From $13.99

"What the Bible Is All About" is the essential handbook for anyone who wants to read and understand God s Word. Inside this revised and updated edition of Henrietta Mears classic, you ll find an overv...









                               		When Skeptics Ask : A Handbook on Christian Evidences by Norman L. Geisler and Ronald M. Brooks (2013, Paperback, Revised) 

                               
 From $14.49

When skeptics ask tough questions, believers can turn to this helpful, user-friendly guide for thoughtful, up-to-date answers. Readers will also learn to identify and respond to the misuse of Scriptur...









                               		Spiritual Disciplines Handbook : Practices That Transform Us by Adele Ahlberg Calhoun (2015, Paperback, Revised) 

                               
 From $13.99

Maybe you long for a more intimate prayer life or deeper insight from God's Word but just don't know how to get there. Or maybe you want to learn about new spiritual disciplines like visio divina, unp...









                               		Martha Stewart's Baking Handbook by Martha Stewart (2005, Hardcover) 

                               
 From $28.00
  31 reviews


Every new book from Martha Stewart is cause for celebration, and with "Martha Stewart s Baking Handbook," she returns to bring the pleasures of baking to readers at every level, from beginner to exper...








Matlab For Beginners: A Gentle Approach By Peter I. Kattan, (paperback), Creates 

                           		
$24.99 at eBay
MATLAB For Beginners: A Gentle Approach by Peter I. Kattan, (Paperback), CreateS , New, Free Shipping This book is written for people who wish to learn MATLAB for the first time. The book is really de...






                           			Getting Started With Matlab 7 Software Manual Guide 

                           		
$9.01 at eBay
You are bidding on:    Getting Started With Matlab Software Manual  new, sealed Warehouse loc: SR-C-1-1 Condition:    As pictured.   Please Note the following: 1. No warranty,   and there is no return...






                           			The Episcopal Handbook, Revised Edition 

                           		
$20.00 at Cokesbury.com
The original Episcopal Handbook, published in 2008, was an instant classic and has been a bestseller ever since. Still providing helpful and insightful information about the Episcopal ethos with a ert...






Matlab For Neuroscientists Second Edition: An Introduction To Scientific Comp... 

                           		
$91.84 at eBay
MATLAB for Neuroscientists, Second Edition: An Introduction to Scientific Computing in MATLAB Features: Product Details: Hardcover: 570 pages Publisher: Academic Press; 2 edition (December 2, 2013) La...






                           			Women Reaching Women in Crisis: Revised (Handbook) 

                           		
$20.99 at Christianbook.com
Women Reaching Women in Crisis: Revised (Handbook)






                           			Introduction To Matlab (3rd Edition) 

                           		
$88.19 at eBay
Introduction to MATLAB (3rd Edition) Features: Product Details: Paperback: 256 pages Publisher: Pearson; 3 edition (March 14, 2014) Language: English ISBN-10: 013377001X ISBN-13: 978-0133770018 Produc...






Matlab Fourth Edition: A Practical Introduction To Programming And Problem So... 

                           		
$61.98 at eBay
Matlab, Fourth Edition: A Practical Introduction to Programming and Problem Solving FEATURES DESCRIPTION About the Author Stormy Attaway is Assistant Professor and Faculty Coordinator for Special Prog...






                           			Advanced Dynamics: Analytical And Numerical Calculations With Matlab

$137.45 at eBay
Advanced Dynamics: Analytical and Numerical Calculations with MATLAB Features: Product Details: Paperback: 610 pages Publisher: Springer; 2012 edition (June 11, 2014) Language: English ISBN-10: 148999...






Handbook For Today's Catholic, Revised And Updated 

                           		
$9.29 at eBay
Product Description Handbook for Today's Catholic, popular for decades, is now even more valuable. This revised and updated edition includes a new introduction, the current list of the Holy Days of Ob...


See Next Results





Store

American Book Warehouse
eBay
Christianbook.com
Cokesbury.com



Language

English
German
Spanish
French
Portuguese
Russian
Hebrew
Italian
Greek, Classical



Illustrated

Yes
No



Grade To

Third Grade
College Graduate Student
up
Twelfth Grade
17
3
Kindergarten
8
2
First Grade
Ninth Grade
Seventh Grade
6
Second Grade
Eleventh Grade
Sixth Grade
7
5
1
ps



Topic

Books
Engineering
Programming
Mathematics
Bibles
Physics
Christian
Contemporary
Classics
Catholic
Earth Science
Photographers
Horses
Criticism
Animals
Music
Magic
Silver
Design
Baking



Subject

Engineering
Religion & Spirituality
Classics
Series
Science & Tech
Religion
Drama
Music
Philosophy
Health Education
Fantasy



Price range

$0 - $356
$356 - $712











Policies |
        FAQ |
	    Site Index


Copyright © 1999-2015 eBay Inc. All Rights Reserved






Martinez, Angel R PHD 102 Middle St Manchester, NH Psychologists - MapQuest







































































































    Martinez, Angel R PHD
  

102 Middle St

Manchester
NH
03101




 Reviews



(603) 666-4896

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!






















Legal






Help





















Deckers Outdoor (DECK) Angel R. Martinez on Q2 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Deckers Outdoor (DECK) Angel R. Martinez on Q2 2016 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptOct.30.15 | About: Deckers Outdoor (DECK) Deckers Outdoor Corp. (NASDAQ:DECK)
Q2 2016 Earnings Call
October 29, 2015 4:30 pm ET
Executives
Brendon Frey - Managing Director-Retail, Apparel & Footwear, ICR LLC
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Analysts
Omar Saad - Evercore ISI
Bob S. Drbul - Nomura Securities International, Inc.
Camilo R. Lyon - Canaccord Genuity, Inc.
Taposh Bari - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Corinna Gayle Van der Ghinst - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. (Broker)
Howard Brett Tubin - Guggenheim Securities LLC
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Operator
Good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen. Thank you for standing by. Welcome to the Deckers Brands Second Quarter Fiscal 2016 Earnings Conference Call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Following the presentation, we will conduct a question-and-answer session. Instructions will be provided at that time for you to queue up for questions. I would like to remind everyone that this conference call is being recorded.
I'll now turn the call over to Brendon Frey, Managing Director of ICR.
Brendon Frey - Managing Director-Retail, Apparel & Footwear, ICR LLC
Welcome everyone joining us today. Before we begin, I would like to remind everyone of the company's Safe Harbor policy. Please note that certain statements made on this call are forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws, which statements are subject to considerable risks and uncertainties. These forward-looking statements are intended to qualify for the Safe Harbor from liability established by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
All statements made on this call other than statements of historical fact are forward-looking statements. These may include statements relating to the company's anticipated financial performance, including its projected revenues, expenses, gross margin, operating margin, capital expenditures, earnings per share, and effective tax rate.
These statements may also relate to the company's brand strategies, store expansion plans, inventory management systems, retailer retention policies, business transformation plan as well as the outlook for the company's markets and the demand for its products. Forward-looking statements made on this call represent our current expectations and are based on currently available information.
Forward-looking statements involve numerous risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from any results predicted, assumed, or implied by the forward-looking statements.
The company has explained some of these risks and uncertainties in its SEC filings, including the risk factors section on its Annual Report on Form 10-K. Given these risks and uncertainties, listeners are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements. Except as required by law or the listing rules of the New York Stock Exchange, the company expressly disclaims any intent or obligation to update any forward-looking statements whether to conform such statements to actual results or to changes in our expectations or as a result of the availability of new information.
As a reminder, we have posted supplemental information about the 2016 second quarter in a document entitled second quarter fiscal 2016 commentary. This document is on our corporate website at www.deckers.com. You can access this document by clicking on the Investor Information tab and then scrolling down to the Featured Reports heading.
With that, I'll now turn it over to Chief Executive Officer and Chair of the Board of Directors, Angel Martinez.

Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Well thanks, Brendon. Good afternoon, everyone, and thank you for joining us today. With me on the call is Dave Powers, President; and Tom George, Chief Financial Officer.
Today, I'll begin with an overview of our second quarter results, and review each brand's performance. I'll then turn the call over to Dave, who'll provide an update to the key areas of focus that he laid out last quarter and the initiatives we have in place to drive our business in the back half of the year. Then we'll turn it over to Tom, who will provide more details on our performance in Q2, our guidance for Q3 and the year, an update on our sheepskin and UGGpure prices for next year as well as our long-term financial drivers.
In the second quarter, we had record revenues of $487 million, or $506 million on a constant currency basis, an increase of 5.4% over last year. EPS for the quarter was $1.11 on a reported basis and $1.42 in constant currency, which represents growth of over 21%. Both our top and bottom line results were in line with our expectations keeping us on track to achieve our full year guidance.
Our recent and projected full year performance would not be possible without the investments we've made over the last several years. The majority of these investments have been directed toward five key areas. Number one, Omni-Channel; number two; product innovation; number three, marketing; number four, people and number five, international expansion. I'd like to take a moment to reflect on the progress we've made in these areas.
Since 2010, we've expanded our global footprint and connected our stores and e-commerce sites to create one of the leading Omni-Channel platforms in our industry. We've introduced compelling new products that have broadened our brand's commercial appeal and extended their selling seasons. We've increased our marketing spend by investing in campaigns that showcase the lifestyle nature of our brands, highlight key products and deliver more personalized consumer connections. We've added leadership throughout the organization that has significantly improved our capabilities and processes, and allowed us to execute on a global scale. And we've dramatically increased control of our brands outside the U.S. by converting from a distributor model to a direct subsidiary model in key countries throughout Europe and Asia.
These critical investments have transformed our company and the transformation continues. Even during this investment phase, we've continued to demonstrate our commitment to returning value to shareholders by repurchasing more than $417 million of our common stock since 2011. We now begin the next chapter in our history that we believe will be marked by leveraged gains from consistent top-line growth and moderating expense growth as we move toward our goal of mid-teen operating margin. I am very excited by what we've created and the value that we are poised to deliver for our shareholders.
Now to the brand's individual Q2 performances, beginning with UGG. Sales grew 5.3% in constant currency driven by selling of the brand's widest assortment ever of weather, casual boots and specialty classics. This was a result of guiding our wholesale customers last spring to ship their fall order book into non-core categories and committing that we would carry core classic inventory to chase demand in season. In line with this strategy, initial sell through of our non-core collections have been strong across all channels. One particular highlight has been the performance of the Shaye, a new rainboot. Its success demonstrates that the weather category is a power natural extension for the brand. Our early reads on our casual and weather boots put us in a strong position to drive sales as we move into holiday and the rest of the fall season.

Along with pre-booking more non-core product, we also took deeper inventory positions in key weather and casual styles, which will allow for reorders of this product in season. In the quarter, demand for core classics was softer than anticipated. That said, this has always been a relatively low volume quarter for core classics given the high average temperatures during the period. In the years when we get a cold September, we've seen strong early sell through as sales of core classics tend to correlate more closely with cold weather than our other collections. We saw this in the quarter on the handful of days when the temperatures dropped. However, for the most part it was a pretty warm September across most of the U.S.
On top of this, domestic sales of core classics has also been pressured by the decline in foreign tourist traffic as a result of the strong dollar. Typically, when international tourists shop at our domestic stores, they purchase core classics and often multiple pairs. We believe a significant component of the softness in core classics we've seen in Q2 is a result of a fewer foreign tourists. Dave will speak to the initiatives we have in place to drive sales of our classic franchise across all channels in the back half of the year and longer term.
Now to HOKA ONE ONE, which grew 51% fueled by growing demand for the brand's expanded line of running shoes and new introductions like the hiking collection. HOKA's authentic position in the running community, which was forged through delivering an improved experience for serious runners, is providing a great foundation for growth as we target a larger consumer audience. Runners of all types are increasingly embracing the brand, thanks to positive word of mouth and despite a very modest marketing budget compared to our running shoe competitors.
One example was at this year's IRONMAN World Championships, HOKA was the number three most worn shoe brand in the race compared to the number six last year and ahead of competitors like Brooks and Newton. HOKA's rapid rise is a testament to the power of the brand, the quality of the product and the hard work of the HOKA team. As we continue to drive top line sales, we're conscious of operating efficiencies and have made the decision to move the brand to the leader to create more synergies and opportunities.
Teva sales were down 11.8% in constant currency as we had expected. The decrease in sales was largely due to the timing of orders as more orders shifted to Q1 this year versus last year. For the quarter, there was strong selling of women's and men's boots, which is helping extend the brand's selling season deeper into the year. The brand had particular strength in the women's Delavina boot collection and the newly introduced men's Durban boot. The original sandals continue to sell well and remain relevant even in colder months with socks and sandals emerging as a fashion trend and key appearances at this year's New York and Paris Fashion Week.
Turning to Sanuk. Sales for the quarter were down 9%. The decline was primarily due to fulfillment issues as we transitioned the brand to our Moreno Valley distribution center. For the quarter, the Yoga Sling collection continued to sell well and we had success with our recently launched women's shoe collection, particularly with a shoe called the Bianca.
The men's canvas collection also sold well, which is encouraging as this category is the key driver of Sanuk's long term success. At Moreno Valley, there is still work to do, but we believe we had turned the corner on the fulfillment issues. The transition of Moreno Valley has not affected the other brands to the same degree as it has Sanuk, especially UGG, as all women's product is serviced from our Camarillo distribution center.

Overall, I'm very pleased to see that the product and distribution strategy that we are executing for each of our brands are producing quality sales growth and providing us good momentum heading into the back half of the year. The combination of our top line performance and expense controls resulted in operating leverage for the second quarter, a goal we have been driving hard towards in fiscal 2016 following a period of strategic investments in our brand and infrastructure to support long term sustainable growth. Our results give me added confidence that we're on the right path to enhancing profitability and creating greater value for our shareholders as we become an even more efficient organization.
With that, I'll now turn it over to Dave, who'll give you more insights on our plans for the second half of the year.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Thank you, Angel. As Angel just mentioned, we are excited as we enter into our busiest selling season and about the opportunities that lie ahead of us. This year we have made a number of strategic changes that put us in a strong position to execute our plans for the year. We have evolved our product to be more closely tailored to current trends and modified the assortment in each of our distribution channels to better align with our consumer demand. We have also better support for our products through more targeted marketing campaigns and enhanced analytics. I'll share more with you on these changes in a minute.
Today, I'm going to touch on four areas of the business, providing you with updates on our progress and our plans going forward. First, I'll review the results of our DTC business. Second, I'll cover how we are unleashing the UGG brand this fall and holiday. Third, I'll discuss how we are driving efficiencies to transform our organization. And finally, I'll update you on our outlook in Q4.
First, I would like to address the results of our DTC business, which includes retail and e-commerce. As a reminder, we report our DTC business on a combined basis as this better reflects how our management team manages and evaluates our business in light of the evolution of our Omni-Channel strategy. As we have discussed previously, the principal reason for this view are due to the interconnectedness of our retail and e-commerce business and the ways in which they feed off each other as well as how we communicate and build relationships with our consumers.
Our DTC comp for the quarter was down mid single digits. This was driven primarily by declines in five of our domestic concept locations, Madison Avenue, Honolulu, Las Vegas, San Francisco and Miami, which we attribute to lower tourist traffic as a result of the strong U.S. dollar. Excluding these specific locations, DTC comps were slightly positive for the quarter. While the strong dollar has created pressure domestically, we believe we have been able to capture those consumers as they stay home to shop because of the investments we have made in our international DTC operations, further validating our global Omni-Channel strategy. As a result, our DTC comps outside of the U.S. were up low double digits in Q2.
Our comp stores continue to generate strong average four-wall operating margins in excess of 25% on a trailing 12 month basis due to our inventory management and OpEx control. We are very pleased with the profitability of our overall store fleet, especially our non-comp stores, which overall continue to perform above our expectations. Nevertheless, we continue to monitor store performance and closed three stores in the quarter. This brings our store closure count to six for this year. Looking ahead, we still plan to open 11 net new stores this fiscal year and open 26 partner doors in China. This will bring our partner store count in China to 49 doors by the end of the year.

Additionally, this fall we will add 15 pop-up stores globally. Last year, we tested pop-ups for the first time and had great return on sales with low build-out cost. We believe the pop-ups will allow us to test new markets and drive revenue during our peak season.
I continue to be confident in our ability to deliver a low single-digit DTC comp for the year for several reasons. First, we have concentrated our marketing, key product launches and in-store activations for the fall and winter season. We believe this is a better use of our investments and focus as over 75% of our annual DTC sales come in the back half of the year.
Second, we believe the impact that the decline in foreign tourism is having on our DTC business comps will begin to ease in Q3 and Q4. This is because our E-Commerce business typically makes up a greater portion of the DTC comp and is less impacted by foreign tourism. Also, we began to lap the decline in foreign tourist traffic we experienced last year as a result of the strengthening dollar. Despite the pressure on the DTC comp in Q2, on a consolidated basis, we performed to the company's top line target as we were able to drive revenue in other areas of the business. We believe this is a testament to our balanced Omni-Channel approach and our brand diversification strategy. While the decline in foreign tourism is beyond our control, we have a number of product and marketing initiatives that we feel will unleash the UGG brand and capture consumer's attention to drive our DTC business.
Let me explain. In comparison to years past, this fall and holiday, we have concentrated our marketing efforts and have our strongest product line up ever to go after the season in a big way. UGG is the footwear brand for holiday and always one of the most top searched brands of the season. This year, we are leveraging our position by amplifying our marketing and elevating our classics and slipper franchises, while driving growth through a wider assortment of casual and weather boots.
Our marketing will be more impactful than in the past, focusing on the key style that drives the business and advertising in high visibility media outlets. We will be creating excitement and awareness through influential partnerships, geo-targeted digital medial and social placements and we will be leveraging our consumer analytics to drive incremental sales through our email database and search optimization.
For this fall and holiday, we are making a big push around the total classics franchise which is something we admittedly did not devote enough attention to last year. We have both innovative new product and marketing support to drive this business and evolve the perception of the brand. As we detailed on the last call, this year we have added two new lines to the franchise with the luxe and slim styles. These two new lines offer existing UGG consumers a new occasion to wear classics as well as attract new consumers into the franchise.
In August, we debuted the Luxe Collection. Luxe is our most premium line in the classics franchise and uses high end Moreno lining. The luxe launch was ticked up across top fashion and industry publications like Vogue and Refinery29. It was worn on the runway at New York Fashion Week. We are very pleased with the sales to-date and for what this collection has done globally to elevate the brand. Luxe has also created great momentum for the introduction of the classic slim, which will launch on November 4.
Slim will be our biggest product launch since the debut of the UGG classic boot. With the launch of the classic slim collection, the brand has further rounded out its classic offering. In celebration of this moment, the brand will unveil a global holiday campaign which captures the emotional feelings of warmth and comfort that forms the foundation of the UGG brand. To further drive awareness of the classic slim as a perfect gift of the season, the teams will implement a focused PR push and amplify in-store merchandising to drive sales.

Going forward, we will continue to drive innovation into our classics franchise. For next fall, we are currently working on plans to evolve our core classic styles. This next evolution is based on consumer insights and addresses consumer feedback. We are excited to share with you more details on the next evolution of the core classic in the coming months as we continue to transform the UGG brand.
This year, we are more strategic with our plans to drive awareness and sales at key times and we are better prepared to optimize the sales opportunity in the weeks around Black Friday and Cyber Monday. During this time, our efforts will focus on driving traffic to our e-commerce sites and on activations in our outlet stores.
Then in December, we will turn our focus to key gift giving items led by our slippers to drive these items like never before. We are supporting our gift giving items and slipper business with increased investments in non-branded search, social media and a program in our North American stores. Then, later in December, we will launch our third annual winter campaign, which will place an elevated focus on the cold weather Adirondack collection. The past two winter campaigns have been successful, but we have incurred stock outs on many of the weather products before the campaigns were launched. This year, we will be in a much better position to support our campaign with inventory.
So, as you've just heard, we have more targeted campaigns and more powerful product this year to truly unleash the power of UGG during our most important season.
Shifting gears, as we've talked about previously, we have been working on disciplined processes to drive efficiencies across the organization and looking at our total operations for ways to further reduce costs. This began last year with our business transformation project, which we believe will help create more visibility in our planning process and improve our systems to support our Omni-Channel growth.
Our major focus from a supply chain perspective is on optimizing our product assortment and concentrating on the products that drive the most volume. We anticipate this will help reduce our development costs and free-up our supply chain to improve our delivery times and speed-to market. We are also continuing to focus on our retail operating model and are finding ways to make that business even more efficient.
In addition, we are creating efficiencies within the organization by finding ways to lever our brand portfolio from how we negotiate with our suppliers and factories to how we sell product to wholesalers and market to our consumers. More than ever, our company is operating as a collective unit and leveraging our expertise across the organization. The management changes over the last year have facilitated increased collaboration across the organization that is allowing us to leverage our brand, consumer insight data and marketing efforts. For example, this past quarter, we utilized the UGG email database to advertise cross-brand product and had great success.
Looking ahead, we will continue to leverage our brands to build off one another. Many of these initiatives are long-term and we'll continue to update on our progress.
Another initiative is product licensing opportunities. Recently, we entered an agreement for our home line and we will continue to explore other UGG non-footwear opportunities. By licensing these businesses, it allows us to redeploy time, talent, and capital to more productive areas of the business to improve our returns on invested capital. This decision stems from our routine examination of our portfolio and our focus on establishing operational guardrails that set performance targets.
In addition, we also recently streamlined the reporting structure of our operations in Asia Pacific. This has allowed us to consolidate operations in APAC in order to eliminate redundancies, reduce SG&A and allowing our resources with our business priorities. Across the organization, we are moving faster than ever to get after short-term and long-term drivers of the business to grow revenue, expand gross margins, lever expenses and improve our operating returns over the next several years.

Finally, we continue to book our Spring 16 business and now have better visibility into Q4. The order book of our brand is materializing as we expected. For UGG, growth will come primarily from weather and causal boots as well as end of season close outs. For HOKA, the brand is expanding its distribution with new retailers and growing its SKU count with existing retailers through new product introduction. Teva is growing its originals and sandals collection building off the success from last spring with strong growth coming from international markets where the brand remains underpenetrated and Sanuk continues to expand its distribution with its national account primarily to the popular Yoga Sling franchise.
In conclusion, I am very happy with how we are positioned as we enter the back half of the year. The changes that we are implementing in our marketing and product development are resonating with consumers and the early reads in our non-core products and introductions like the Luxe have been strong.
Looking beyond this year, we are focused on strategic initiatives in the areas of the business where we believe have the biggest opportunity, specifically continuing to attack the running market with the HOKA brand and within UGG, it's evolving our classic franchise and aggressively getting after categories like weather and causal in our men's business and extensions like Lounge. Across our brand portfolio, we see additional white space for distribution and ways to better leverage our brands going forward.
With that, I'll now turn it over to Tom to review the financials.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Good afternoon, everyone. Before I begin, I would like to remind everyone that we posted a commentary on the quarterly financials under the Investor Information tab on our corporate website.
In summary, our sales results were in line with expectations and earnings per share was slightly better than our forecast due primarily to timing of expenses now expected to be incurred in the back half of the year and the benefit of our Q2 share repurchase.
Now starting with revenue on a constant currency basis, for the quarter revenue increased 5.4% to $506 million. On a reported basis revenue increased 1.4% to $487 million. Gross margin was 44% in the second quarter compared to 46.6% last year. The change in gross margin was primarily due to FX headwinds from the strengthening of the U.S. dollar. We gained SG&A leverage this quarter with SG&A, as a percent of sales, at 33.5% compared to 34.2% a year ago. For the remainder of the fiscal year, we are on track to deliver leverage. For the quarter, we reported earnings per share of $1.11 versus $1.17 a year ago and better than our guidance of $1.05 per share.
Inventories at the end of Q3 were $595 million, an increase of 23.5% over the same period last year. Our inventory is well positioned to support growth during the back half including more core classics to chase in-season demand as part of the shift in our pre-book strategy that we developed with our wholesale partners.
Also, we are carrying more weather and causal product to allow for our wholesale partners to reorder in-season and to reduce the stock outs we experienced last year. For Q3 and Q4, we expect sales growth to outpace inventory growth. During the quarter, we repurchased approximately 354,000 shares or $23.8 million at an average price of $67.18. As of September 30, 2015 we had $102.9 million remaining under the $200 million stock repurchase program we announced in January 2015.
Now moving on to our outlook, based on our second quarter results and current visibility, we are reiterating our full year guidance. We expect fiscal year 2016 constant currency revenues to increase approximately 10.5%, an increase of 8% on a reported basis. Full year constant currency earnings per share is projected to be approximately $5.73 which now accounts for the share repurchase in Q2 representing the increase of 23%. On a reported basis, earnings per share is now projected to be approximately $5.18 adjusting for the share re-purchase in Q2, representing an increase of 11.2 % over fiscal 2015 earnings per share of $4.66.

This guidance assumes gross margins of approximately 48 % and SG&A as a percentage of sales of 35.5%. With respect to the third and fourth quarters, our revenue guidance has not changed. We still see Q3 reported revenue growing approximately 9%, and Q4 reported revenue up approximately 18 % on a year-over-year basis.
We expect Q3 earnings per share of $5 and Q4 earnings per share of $0.57. For Q3, our gross margins are projected to be slightly under 52% and SG&A as a percentage of sales is projected to roughly 25%.
Finally, we recently completed our sheepskin negotiations for fiscal 2017. As we indicated on our last call sheepskin prices continue to be favorable and our innovation of UGG Pure continues to play a significant part in reducing demand and stabilizing prices in the sheepskin market.
We expect these costs to be roughly a 100 basis point improvement over fiscal 2016. This does not constitute our gross margin guidance for next year as our sheepskin inputs are only one component of our gross margins. Long term, we remain committed to achieving mid teens operating margins over the next five years. From a gross margin perspective, we have three main drivers: adjusting our business model to create supply chain efficiencies, improving our product development process and reducing our go-to-market costs, and continuing to grow our Direct-to-Consumer business.
From an SG&A expense leverage perspective, this is driven by the fact that most of our Direct-to-Consumer, corporate, and international infrastructure investments have been made. In addition, we continue to gain more visibility around the efficiencies we expect to generate from our business transformation project.
Our Omni-Channel investments have laid the foundation for growth and now we can begin to lever them to expand our operating performance and improve our returns on invested capital. I am confident in our ability to lever this year and beyond and look forward to reporting our Q3 results on February 4, 2016.
With that, I will now turn it over to the operator for Q&A.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Thank you. Thank you. Our first question comes from the line of Omar Saad from Evercore. Please proceed with your question.
Omar Saad - Evercore ISI
Thanks, for solid quarter guys.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Thanks, Omar.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Thanks, Omar.
Omar Saad - Evercore ISI
I wanted to ask – yeah, sure. I wanted to ask about the holiday push, a lot of stuff that, Dave, you talked about around the classics franchise and the genesis of this kind of evolved strategy what you think you've been missing in the past. How big an opportunity is it? And, I guess, my follow-up question is to help us think about the inventory strategy mechanically, how that better positions you and does it reduce risk having that much inventory or just fulfill chase opportunities, I guess the two part sort of the same idea?
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah, great question. And I really look at this, Omar, as a turning point for the UGG brand. We have turned the corner on reliance on our four classics business. We know have great success in our casual boots and our weather. In fact, the core classics as a percent of total women's business is down below 35%, 25% of our total UGG business. So, it just speaks to the opportunity that we have in new categories beyond classics. But at the same time we are not complacent with the classics business either. So what you've seen with the Luxe introduction and the slim introduction next week, those are evolutions of the core classic items into opportunities for new customers and new wearing occasions for our brand and at the same time, we are also going back and making sure that we are taking a good look at the core classics, which quite frankly we've been a little bit complacent with over the years. And so, what we've said is we really listened to consumer insights on what they are looking for in classics going forward and we're going to apply some innovation to those classics for next fall.

We are still working through the mechanics of that and so it's too early to see any specifics with regards to its inventory strategy and how that's going to play out but we are committed to keeping that a full price business and managing through the inventory accordingly so it doesn't disrupt the market. But the good news is next year it creates a lot more flexibility in our core business as well as our specialty classics business. So, instead of putting 40%, 50% of our core classic into the marketing place and hoping they sell, we have a lot more options for the consumers and we have a lot more leverages to pull in the process. So, I think it's an exciting time to the UGG brand, I think it is an exciting time for the UGG consumer and I think they are really going to benefit from the evolution of the classics and the updates that we have coming down the pike.
Omar Saad - Evercore ISI
Okay, and then just to be clear the gross margin, the change in year-over-year trend in the gross margin this quarter is entirely related to I guess you call it transactional currency exposure and not something going on with inventory or products?
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
No, it's right on margins (33:25)
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yes.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Primarily due to FX headwinds year-over-year.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah, yeah.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Just to comment quickly on the inventory, we're really pleased really we have been able to manage our inventory levels at the end of this quarter. We've actually brought in from inventory earlier as we've had the capability to chase some product in-season. It also helps us mitigate the stock-outs we had last year and most of the inventory increase is really related to higher quantities of women's leather and casual boots and men's slipper and leather products and that all supports our pre-book strategy we had, the shift in most of the wholesale orders that we talked about in the past.
I think another thing to point out on inventory is, into the third quarter and the fourth quarter our inventory levels, the growth year-over-year is going to moderate significantly and the growth levels are going to be lower than our guided sales growth. And for the total year, at the end of the year, our UGG inventory level will be half what it is at the end of September.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
And I think the other thing on the inventory is the majority of the increase is coming out of non-core classic. So, it's more the casual boots and weather, which we missed opportunity in last year and we are really poised to chase that business in the end of Q3 into Q4 this year.
Omar Saad - Evercore ISI
Thanks, it's all really helpful.
Operator
Our next question comes from the line of Bob Drbul with Nomura. Please go ahead with your question.
Bob S. Drbul - Nomura Securities International, Inc.
Hi. Good afternoon. I just had two questions. The first one is, you are talking about the weather impacting the business and I guess, have you had any major cancellations from your retail partners, September or October, that you could speak to. And then the second question is, on expenses, Tom, you said there was a shift out of the quarter. I was wondering if you could quantify how much of that came out of the second quarter and you know maybe the increased marketing, any ideas on how much more you are spending in the third quarter?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Yeah, maybe I'll start with the expense shift; it was about $2 million to $3 million and it was mostly marketing, and that went into the December quarter. In terms of cancellations we're really too early in the season, really. We really haven't had anything of significance. If there is weather issues down the road, most of those cancellations would come later in the quarter.

Bob S. Drbul - Nomura Securities International, Inc.
Yeah.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
If any at all.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah, no, and we haven't had anything significant. And any cancellations that we've had, for the most part, we are able to back-fill or replace that business with casual boots and weather product that is selling through well, so.
Bob S. Drbul - Nomura Securities International, Inc.
Great, thank you very much.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah.
Operator
Our next question comes from the line of Camilo Lyon with Canaccord. Please proceed with your question.
Camilo R. Lyon - Canaccord Genuity, Inc.
Thanks, nice quarter guys. Just a follow-up on the last question. Could you just help reconcile some of the commentary we have been hearing? So there's obviously warmer weather that's impacted the classics business, you've commented on that. There is also a lot of talk of excess inventory in the channel, yet your guidance is – embeds a pretty significant acceleration. Just help us connect the dots there and understand exactly what's going on there because it seems like there is something that's not necessarily congruent there.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah. I think the thing you have to remember Camilo is that usually – August and September are small quarters, small months for the core classic business. So even though the weather has been warm and that's true, we're hearing that, and it has affected the core selling; it's a small portion of inventory that we're talking about. So there isn't a big backlog that's left over from what we would have sold in September and August in Q3 because of that softness in the business.
Business excess in the channel overall, we're not really seeing that. We are managing that well. If you remember we planned the core classics business down from an open to buy perspective and shifted people's inventory to more into casual boots and weather and those are the things that are selling through. So, at this point, things look as planned.
Camilo R. Lyon - Canaccord Genuity, Inc.
Great. And then just my follow-up is, is there an added expectation of cancellations that's built into your plan. I think before you were looking at cancellations offsetting reorders; is that still the case, or is there more of a weighting towards cancellations?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
No, that – it's still our original guidance. The small amount of reorders are assumed and the small amount of cancellations that would offset each other. So we feel really good where we are at right now with the business.
Camilo R. Lyon - Canaccord Genuity, Inc.
Thanks very much. Good luck.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Thanks.
Operator
And next question is from the line of Taposh Bari with Goldman Sachs. Please proceed with your questions.
Taposh Bari - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Hey, good morning or good afternoon. So, Angel and Dave, nice to see you guys able to deliver versus your expectations, a lot of external headwinds out there, especially a lot of weather talk.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Thank you.
Taposh Bari - Goldman Sachs & Co.
You guys called out core classic weakness and tourism pressure, yet you were still able to make your numbers. I guess if I think back to Deckers of the past that might not have happened. So I'm trying to better understand in light of some of the sort of those headwinds, how you were able to still deliver. And, if in fact, the business is a little bit less sensitive to some of those external factors like weather as we think about what could or could not happen in terms of seasonality into the holiday?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah. Thanks Taposh. I think it's a radically different scenario now that we have versus a few years ago, even last year. Last year was a bit of a wakeup call for us because we saw that we were still – even though we have been innovating a lot of new product, we felt that we still had exposure. And as Dave said, we consciously moved our customer base off of core classic and into the fashion and the weather product that is performing quite well and tried to right-size the classic business going forward, understanding that it's a core staple of a lot of wardrobes and a lot of people's closets and we need more innovation there. So really our idea here is to create a brand, a lifestyle brand, that is appropriate for any kind of seasonality. You know, whether it's rain or whether it's very cold weather or our spring line has done quite well. So, we really needed to dimensionalize the brand and I think the team has done that. They have done a fantastic job with that.

Another thing that we have done is that we've have got a lot more insight into our business. As you know, we've been investing in business transformation. We are much better able to review the state of our business in a real-time basis and make adjustments, and a lot of adjustments are being made because we have insights that we wouldn't have if we were not an Omni-Channel business. So the fact is that with our own stores and our E-Commerce business, we are able to read the consumer preference and we're improving our time to market so that we are able to react in a much faster way.
Witness, for example, the classic slim that's coming and launching in about a week or so, that was directly from consumers that we knew there were a large percentage of consumers that likes the brand but could not get past the shape of the original classic. And we think that classic slim is really going to be well received. So, it's a whole combination of things, but it's resulting in what, I'll use the phrase Dave used, unleash UGG. I mean, UGG is being unleashed. There was a lot of – I think on our part concern about accelerating innovation and not tipping the apple cart et cetera and what we found is that consumers really don't want that. Consumers want fresh product, exciting product, stuff that makes them get out of their chair and go to the store and not just click on a website because clearly what's good for everyone is have to have this brand, get people out to the stores to try the product on and that's the role of this brand in this time of the year and I think it's going to fulfill that mission for a lot of our customers.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah. Just to add on to that one thing Taposh, is that softness that we are talking about in core classics is primarily an North American issue at the moment, and where we are seeing a little bit of offset in that is the international business. We've had great business in our DTC business outside the U.S. and particularly in the e-commerce growth in the multiple brands and multiple websites externally.
Taposh Bari - Goldman Sachs & Co.
If I can just ask a quick follow up on that line of questioning. How are your retail partners responding to what you are doing and also vis-à-vis the external condition? So, as I think about kind of the investor reaction, mild weather equals inventory risk equals UGG exposure. I guess, again, that's the way it's put out in the past, but the brand is clearly demonstrated an ability to kind of endure that kind of seasonality and cyclicality and I am sure the retail partners have appreciated that. So is there a different mentality this time around in light of what's going on on the ground at retail?
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah. I think for the wholesale partners that have followed the strategy recommendations of changing their mix to be more reliant on weather and causal boots, they're seeing the benefits of that, and so that's a good story. They also know this is a very resilient brand and it's still early in the season and they know that when the weather turns, the consumer is going to come calling and they feel very good about their ability to flex their inventory with our partnership to be able to meet those demand. So, for the most part we are having very healthy conversations with our partners and they are confident that we're going to deliver.
Taposh Bari - Goldman Sachs & Co.
Great, all the best.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Thanks.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Thanks.
Operator
Our next question comes from the line of Erinn Murphy with Piper Jaffray. Please go ahead with your question.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Great, thank you and good afternoon. Dave, I was hoping you could may be expand a little bit more about the Direct-to-Consumer business you just mentioned outside of the U.S. It sounds like that was a little bit better. Can you maybe just parse out for us in some sort of granularity the change between Europe, China and Japan and what you are really seeing in some of the international regions in that business?

David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah. So I can only speak to total DTC, not particular retail versus e-commerce. But I will say that our comps outside the U.S. were very healthy double digit growth comps in Europe and low single digit growth in Asia Pacific. Consistent with what we've said about the (44:20) the tourist shopper is shopping a little bit more at home, but also to the strength of the assortment and the merchandising, the operation of the teams in those markets. So, China is showing signs of stabilization, Japan is still strong and the Europe business is actually, I would say, turned the corner and starting to improve nicely.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
That's helpful to hear, thank you. And, I guess, just following up on the China piece and particularly as you do (44:43) you've actually kind of repriced some of the products there. Can you just talk about some of the learnings, what the consumer demand profiles look like post re-pricing? And then if you look across the fleet, are there any other key regions that you may have to revisit the pricing on in the later point? Thanks.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah. Erinn, it's still early days in the pricing in China. That business is very seasonal over there, so we – the initial re-pricing was soft, but it wasn't a high seasonality timeframe for us in China. As the season kicks in, we are starting to see a nice healthy benefit from that pricing. It's not a dramatic change in pricing, but it's healthy and it's bringing more consumers into the brand, so I would say it's been a positive move and we will continue to monitor that. The other place we are looking to make adjustments is in the Hong Kong market to be consistent with the rest of Asia Pacific. But outside of that, we don't see any other pricing adjustments at this time.
Erinn E. Murphy - Piper Jaffray & Co (Broker)
Got it, thanks. And if I could just sneak in one more clarification for Tom, just on that second quarter gross margin being down about 260 basis points. Is that entire piece FX? I mean, were there any offset on the positive side just given your mix shift into DTC as well as the UGGpure's overall sheepskin costing environment being more favorable. We're just trying to kind of understand the major puts and takes of that line? Thanks you.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Yeah. Erinn, most of it was the FX headwind, that's about for the second quarter. It was 210 basis points of headwind. Few other things, small little amounts nothing really of significance that impacts things going forward.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question comes from the line of Corinna Van der Ghinst with Citigroup. Please go ahead with your question.
Corinna Gayle Van der Ghinst - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. (Broker)
Thank you, hi. Firstly I wanted to address SG&A. I know Dave touched on some of the big picture areas that you guys are targeting. But could you maybe talk about some of the specific near term efficiencies driving improvement over the next couple of quarters? And also you guys talked about the supply chain process. Can you talk a little bit more about what you've changed or reengineered in your supply chain process to enable you to improve your speed to market in the near term whether with the classic luxe or slim or what you guys have coming out going forward?
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Yeah, good question. We're putting a lot of focus on this right now and I think you heard some of the things we mentioned in the call with regards to restructuring our Hong Kong office over there that will have a knock on permanent effect on SG&A. Looking at licensing, leveraging our brands for procurement in other areas. Long-term we are looking at a few components. One, we're just looking at how to streamline the offering of our brand. So getting really focused on SKU productivity, adoption rates, and making sure that where we are putting our time and our development into the line is going to give us the biggest payback. So the brands are really focused on, eliminating unnecessary styles and SKUs. And that has a knock on effect on our development cost, on our sample cost, on our delivery cost, and allows us to be much more efficient at our factories as well.

At the same time, we're also looking at consolidating our factory base in some cases to be more efficient and be closer to market and then just overall just improving our go-to-market process in general to eliminate waste in the process. So, it's still early days, but the teams are very, very focused on finding efficiencies in getting their energies and their efforts are focused on the areas they are going to give us the biggest pay back and I think we will have more to share with you on that in the next coming months. The other piece that will have continued benefits for us is the business transformation project that we are undergoing and you will start to see the benefits of that in inventory management in some places in margin over the next year.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Corinna, this is Tom, let me follow up as well. On our current SG&A structure over the past few years, we've been investing in our international infrastructure to be able to scale the business internationally both in Asia, in Europe as well as corporate infrastructure to scale a much bigger multi brand global company and we are starting to see leverage on those kinds of investments. So, really I don't see that many more of those kind of investments going forward and I think another thing to point out and this is really related to some of our segment reporting, our Direct-to-Consumer segment. That segment absorbs the overhead cost related to scale a much bigger Direct-to-Consumer business, including most of our Asia Pacific overheads and some of our Europe overheads are in that segment. And those investments really are behind us and we are starting to get leverage on those as well.
Corinna Gayle Van der Ghinst - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. (Broker)
Okay, that's helpful commentary. And then just for my follow up. I did want to clarify some questions from earlier. Can you just help us understand in that 24% inventory growth in UGG, how much of that is in core classics and how much of it is in non-classics? And then just a review on share repurchases for the rest of the year? Thank you.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Very little of it is in core classics, most of it's in the non-classic product, it's in the weather product, it's in the women's casual as well, there is some increase in the men's products as well and slippers. We have a bigger investment in slippers than we did a year ago, because we actually had some stock outs a year ago, slippers early in the season, so. And the slim product, there is some slim in there as well. So, and we are really pleased in terms of our inventory management capability. We brought it in early, we didn't really want to have any logistic issues to stop us from having the product to service our busy part of the season. And consistent with that from an inventory management point of view, by the end of the year we expect the UGG inventory would be half to what it is at the end of this quarter.
And I think another thing to point out is, we've talked about some startup issues related to our Moreno Valley distribution center. That distribution center does not service the UGG women's business, that's still on our Camarillo distribution center and there has been no issues there. That's mostly impacted our Sanuk business and we might get to it later, but as a result of that we've missed some sales with Sanuk and we're going to take down our Sanuk number for the year.
Corinna Gayle Van der Ghinst - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc. (Broker)
Great. And just on the share repurchases, please?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
And on the share repurchase we did – we don't really comment on what we're going to do in the future. I think something to point out there is our – the period of time we're now in is our highest demand for working capital and therefore our highest borrowing on our line of credit. So you have to be sensitive to the cash needs to run the business, so therefore this period of time is the period of time we have fewer share repurchases.

Operator
Thank you. Our next question is from the line of Howard Tubin with Guggenheim. Please go ahead with your questions.
Howard Brett Tubin - Guggenheim Securities LLC
Hey. Thanks, guys. Can you just remind us, talking about UGGpure, where you stand in terms of its usage now in the sheepskin part of the UGG collection and where it will be next year if we look out to next year?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
It's currently about 33%. We do see going forward more opportunities for that to expand going forward. I think something interesting to point out to our innovation with UGGpure and what it's done to the demand for the table grade product in the market. Table grade cost has actually gone down below some of the UGGpure cost. So we will even start addressing possibly using the even more table grade product going forward as well.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
It's also a great opportunity for our Koolaburra brand as we start to ignite that business and bring that to market next fall.
Howard Brett Tubin - Guggenheim Securities LLC
Got it. Thank you very much.
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
Sure.
Operator
Our next question is from the line of Jim Duffy with Stifel. Please proceed with your question.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Thanks, Good afternoon, guys. I have three questions for you. Hopefully two of them are quick. On the fiscal third quarter, what's the linearity of the quarter, kind of the split between months typically?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Mostly back end loaded.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
(53:18) because there is a high element of Direct-to-Consumer, a high element of E-Commerce, so it's mostly back end loaded.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Did I hear a 50% December?
David Powers - President, Deckers Brands
No, no, no. Yeah.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Mostly back end loaded.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Okay. And then, Tom, as you think about objectives to lever SG&A in fiscal 2017, what's the sales growth you would need for that?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
That's a good question. We are not giving guidance for next year, so that's obviously a good question. That will be one element, and we – but I think the way we are looking at our SG&A and our overhead structure right now is, most of our investments are behind us and we've got the ability to leverage on – really on reasonable growth rates. And we're continuing to evaluate ways to streamline the business, like we've done in Asia Pacific with the Hong Kong streamlining. And we continue to evaluate how we're going to streamline other parts of the business around the world. And as I mentioned earlier on the call, we're starting to get good leverage on the buildup we've had to drive our Direct-to-Consumer business as well.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
Okay. Fair enough. And then the final question, I was a little confused on the inventory strategy and the position. It sounded like you were going to back stock inventory in classics but try to pre-book the other classifications, but you're saying the inventory growth is in the other classifications?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
I think, Jim, the thing to point out there is we always have a certain level of safety stock at the classics at any point in time. It really – and we didn't grow that much at all, but in the newer product we do have the capability to service that product as well – reorders for that product, for weather product and the casual product. Because last year, we did have some stock outs on that product because we did get some reorders.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.

Okay. Good luck guys. Oh, I am sorry go ahead.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
No, that's good. Go ahead, Jim. Thanks.
Jim V. Duffy - Stifel, Nicolaus & Co., Inc.
I was just going to say good luck to you guys in the coming months.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
All right, Jim. Thank you Jim.
Operator
Our next question comes from the line of Mitch Kummetz with B. Riley. Please go ahead with your questions.
Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
Yeah. Thanks for taking my questions. Tom, I was hoping you can give us a little more help on Q4. So I think you said $0.58 of earnings in the fourth quarter, if I heard you right or...?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
$0.57.
Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
$0.57, so that's a pretty big step up from Q4 last year. Obviously you expected the revenue to be up nicely; I think it was 18%, right? But can you kind of bridge the gap between the revenue growth and the earnings that your are expecting, maybe just touch upon kind of expectations around gross margin and SG&A for Q4?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Right. First off, just to reiterate on the top line, Dave gave you some detail about our confidence level to be able to drive that kind of revenue growth. We feel really good where our pre-book is at this point in time for the fourth quarter, as well as the product and other opportunities we have that are driving them.
In terms of the margin, we are actually expecting improved gross margin relative to a year ago in that fourth quarter. And as you may recall, a year ago, we were closing down the TSUBO brand, the MOZO brand. We airfreighted a fair amount of product and we had some airfreight costs that put pressure on last year's gross margin. And there still will be some sheepskin benefit for Q4 as well. And then the – from an operating expense point of view, consistent with some of the earlier discussion, we're going to be getting leverage on the operating expenses in the fourth quarter. So that helps drive earnings per share growth.
Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
Do you think more of the op margin increase will come on the SG&A side just given the level of sales growth that you are expecting?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
I think the biggest driver there is just year-over-year gross margins as well as the top line growth. There will be some modest SG&A leverage, but the biggest driver there are the top line growth as well as the gross margin. And Mitch, while you're talking about gross margins, let me also add to the second quarter; there was a big FX headwind we talked about, 210 basis points to 220 basis points of FX headwind. We also had some pressure on the margin relative to a year ago because we did have to airfreight some product in as well just to make sure we had it available and had it in inventory to service the biggest part of the season.
Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
Got it. And then as a follow-up, maybe on (58:02) Dave. You guys have talked a lot about kind of steering retailers towards the non-core product and you've had a lot of success with that. Can you talk a little bit about what's happening outside the U.S.? I mean, are you doing the same thing with your partners there even through the distributors and kind of what success level have you seen there in terms of the performance of the non-core product with international accounts?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Well, actually – this is Angel. We've have seen even more success particularly in Europe, for example. We've had – we've have been out of stock on a fair amount of what we call women's casual product. Our subsidiary in the UK is looking for inventory from the rest of the company, so that in and of itself has been – and that began in the second quarter. So that really is a good sign. Where people followed the strategy, the results proved to be what the consumer wanted.

Mitch Kummetz - B. Riley & Co. LLC
And are you able to move some of the inventory from the U.S. over to Europe to kind of satisfy that demand?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah. We are looking at areas in the company where – it's specific product so it depends of where the inventory fits, whether it's Asia Pacific or North America. But you know we are very flexible with our supply chain in our Omni-Channel organization, so we can make some of those moves. It's obviously at a cost, but it's better to make sure the consumer gets what they want and then have them wait, so those are the things we are looking at.
Operator
Thank you. Our final question today is coming from line of Scott Krasik with Buckingham Research. Please proceed with your questions.
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Yeah. Hi, everyone. Thanks. A few questions on DTC. I know you are trying to get away from it, but can you sort of allude to, or generally, what the E-Commerce growth was in the quarter?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
No, unfortunately, Scott, we are only reporting at a DTC level going forward, so I can't do that.
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Okay. And then all of these DTC numbers, are these all constant currency?
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Yeah, the comps are in constant currency, yes.
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Okay. So, maybe talk about your confidence to see that accelerate to meet your target, which I think hasn't changed even though you are a little bit short this quarter?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah. As we said in the call, in the script, there is lot of indications that are still positive for us delivering that number. You have to remember, we still have 75% of the year to go in DTC in Q3 and Q4 and we are off to a good start there. We are still optimistic about delivering that number. E-Com also starts to make up a bigger percentage of DTC sales in the back half, so the mix changes. At the end of Q3 into Q4, we start to lap that foreign tourism impact in our flagship stores, which is significant, so we'll get some of that back. And I think, like I said, the product launches, the marketing focus, the digital marketing and the analytics were all concentrated on driving traffic to the stores and driving traffic to the sites. And I would say we are better poised than ever to be able to pull some of those levers in the business.
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
And I think I just heard you say, just to be sure, did you say you are off to a good start in DTC in October?
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah, I can't comment on that. I mean things look like they are on plan.
Thomas A. George - Chief Financial Officer
Right.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Yeah.
Scott D. Krasik - The Buckingham Research Group, Inc.
Okay. Thanks.
Operator
Thank you. At this time, I'll turn this floor back to management for closing comments.
Angel R. Martinez - Chairman and CEO
Well, thank you all for joining us today. Clearly, we are pretty confident in the strategic direction that we are moving in and we believe we are going to continue to deliver significant value to shareholders. I would like to thank our employees around the world. There has been a lot of heavy lifting, I hope you can appreciate that to make all of this change real. And I'm extremely proud of the work everyone's done, the long hours and the dedication and commitment that it's taken and the insight that we've got from our employees. So it's just a great group of people to work with and I am confident that we will continue to deliver results. So thank you all and we will speak to you on the next call.
Operator
This concludes today's teleconference. You may disconnect your lines at this time. Thank you for your participation.

Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Consumer Goods, Textile - Apparel Footwear & Accessories, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All DECK TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Consumer Goods and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Consumer Goods and Retail StocksGeneral Motors - Earnings Preview For 2nd Quarter 2017GM• Today, 1:42 PM • Brent A. MillerLa-Z-Boy Forges Onward After Falling Short On Growth PlanLZB• Today, 5:25 AM • Underanalyzed EquitiesI Am Loving My Dividends From Philip MorrisPM• Today, 3:51 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•35 CommentsUnder Armour: Under Duress?UA, UAA• Today, 3:24 AM • D.M. Martins Research•3 CommentsTime To Be More Tolerant For This Growth Dairy Stock?SAPIF• Yesterday, 5:26 AM • Brad MacIntoshEstimating ANFI's FY 2018 Margins And EarningsANFI• Yesterday, 12:49 AM • Sven Carlin•6 CommentsNorthsight Capital Makes Cannabis Stocks Look BadNCAP• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:59 PM • Debra Borchardt•2 CommentsCoca-Cola: Where Does It End?KO• Fri, Jul. 21, 3:04 PM • Josh Arnold•14 CommentsPhilip Morris Q2 Earnings Summary: What You Need To KnowPM• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:52 PM • ValueAnalyst•23 CommentsTesla's South Australia Battery Deal Shows Why The Company Is Not An Energy CompanyTSLA• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:30 PM • EnerTuition•212 CommentsSkechers Looks Good Into 2018SKX• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:19 PM • L&F Capital Management•6 CommentsDaily Insider Ratings Round Up 7/20/17: NAV, OLBK, SKIS, SHLO, TWNNAV• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:38 PM • InsiderInsightsAutomakers Invest In Nauto's $159 Million Financing RoundGM• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:37 PM • Donovan Jones•1 CommentAutonomous Driving Leaps Forward, Leaving Tesla BehindTSLA• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:14 PM • Donn Bailey•256 CommentsHotel California: Why Tesla Can Check Out Any Time It Likes, But It Can Never LeaveTSLA• Fri, Jul. 21, 12:13 PM • Trapping Value•153 CommentsVanguard Prepares To Destroy The S&P 500 AgainVDC• Fri, Jul. 21, 11:02 AM • Colorado Wealth Management Fund•21 CommentsBurberry: Still Undervalued As It Builds Up To A Potentially Improved 2018?Editors' Pick • BURBY• Fri, Jul. 21, 10:00 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentAltria: Dividend Is Safe...For NowMO• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:11 AM • Josh Arnold•30 CommentsThe Dividend Stock Bubble Has Claimed Another VictimPM• Fri, Jul. 21, 9:04 AM • Josh Arnold•27 CommentsValue Trap: Adient Plc's Contradicting Growth OutlookADNT• Fri, Jul. 21, 8:19 AM • Centaur Investments•3 CommentsUnilever Up 43% YTD With More To ComeUL, UN• Fri, Jul. 21, 7:25 AM • Iron Value•9 CommentsFaurecia SA ACT 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFURCF• Fri, Jul. 21, 6:31 AM • SA TranscriptsAs Sales Plunge, GM Might Cancel 6 Car ModelsGM• Fri, Jul. 21, 6:10 AM • Wolf Richter•67 CommentsSkechers Shows Retail Footwear LivesSKX• Fri, Jul. 21, 1:33 AM • Quad 7 Capital•14 CommentsA Contrarian Vote In Favor Of McCormick's AcquisitionMKC• Thu, Jul. 20, 8:21 PM • Vince Martin•19 CommentsTesla Solar Roof, The Odds Of Surviving Home Solar MarketTSLA• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:57 PM • X. Dong Wang•110 CommentsWhere Are The Solar Roofs?TSLA• Thu, Jul. 20, 4:08 PM • Galileo Russell•184 CommentsA. Schulman: How Did I Not See This Train Wreck Coming?SHLM• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:31 PM • Quad 7 CapitalCampbell Soup (CPB) Investor Presentation - SlideshowCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:35 PM • SA TranscriptsCampbell Soup (CPB) Investor Presentation - SlideshowCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:35 PM • SA TranscriptsBunge (BG) Updates On Competitiveness Program - SlideshowBG• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:22 PM • SA TranscriptsEthan Allen Interiors (ETH) Investor Presentation - SlideshowETH• Thu, Jul. 20, 2:00 PM • SA TranscriptsBMW Leads Investment In Used-Car Marketplace ShiftBMWYY• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:50 PM • Donovan JonesTilly's: The Best Of A Bad SectorTLYS• Thu, Jul. 20, 1:32 PM • Vince MartinChurch & Dwight: Waterpik Deal Looks Decent; Valuation Remains FullCHD• Thu, Jul. 20, 12:17 PM • The Value Investor•5 CommentsMcCormick - 'Winner' Of Reckitt Benckiser's Food Business AuctionMKC• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:55 AM • The Value Investor•13 CommentsUnder Armour Will Outlast Negative NewsUAA• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:43 AM • Brent A. Miller•11 CommentsThe Only Detriment For Philip MorrisPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 11:18 AM • Jonathan Weber•14 CommentsPhilip Morris: Let It FallPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:25 AM • Quad 7 Capital•25 CommentsPhilip Morris International Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:20 AM • SA Transcripts•4 CommentsPhilip Morris Quits SmokingPM• Thu, Jul. 20, 10:00 AM • ValueAnalyst•54 CommentsCampbell Soup: Red Flags For A Red LabelCPB• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:43 AM • Dan Stringer•10 CommentsPolaris Industries Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPII• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:23 AM • SA TranscriptsWABCO Holdings Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesWBC• Thu, Jul. 20, 9:03 AM • SA TranscriptsUnilever Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUL• Thu, Jul. 20, 3:37 AM • SA TranscriptsWould Tesla Acquire Faraday Future And Lucid Motors?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 7:59 PM • Anton Wahlman•89 CommentsTesla Ownership: T. Rowe Price Sells, What's Next?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 6:08 PM • ValueAnalyst•281 CommentsSan Miguel: Riding The Political Waves In The PhilippinesSMGBY• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:45 PM • Nick Cox•2 CommentsZEV Credits: They're Real And They're Spectacular!TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:24 PM • Kurt B. Feierabend•125 CommentsNow Is Not The Time To Buy TeslaTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:44 PM • Isaac Tang•68 CommentsImitation Is The Sincerest Form Of FlatteryVLKAY• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:33 PM • Life Sciences Millennial•1 CommentDo New Tesla Board Additions Signal Big Changes Ahead?TSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 11:38 AM • Donn Bailey•137 CommentsTiffany & Company Is Outclassed By Signet Jewelers And MovadoMOV• Wed, Jul. 19, 10:50 AM • DJ Habig•3 CommentsValue in TAPTAP• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:38 AM • Tim Gruppi•15 CommentsCampbell Soup Company - Why Legacy Products Will Die A Slow DeathCPB• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:30 AM • James Sands•6 CommentsNeenah Paper: Well Positioned In A Niche Premium MarketNP• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:17 AM • Dustin Barnett•4 CommentsDiebold Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDBD• Wed, Jul. 19, 8:09 AM • SA TranscriptsTesla Investors Swallow The Blue PillTSLA• Wed, Jul. 19, 6:31 AM • Montana Skeptic•560 CommentsProcter & Gamble: Let The Fun BeginPG• Wed, Jul. 19, 5:58 AM • Activist Stocks•12 CommentsProcter & Gamble: Can The Supertanker Be Turned?PG• Wed, Jul. 19, 4:35 AM • John Abbink•5 CommentsVolvo AB ADR B 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesVOLVY• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:22 AM • SA TranscriptsWhy I Changed My Mind About GentexGNTX• Wed, Jul. 19, 3:10 AM • Samuel Smith•8 CommentsHarley-Davidson Spirals Down, Announces U.S. Layoffs, Builds Factory In ThailandHOG• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:44 AM • Wolf Richter•33 CommentsEcolab: A High Quality Dividend Aristocrat Held By Bill GatesECL• Wed, Jul. 19, 1:42 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•12 CommentsHarley-Davidson, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHOG• Wed, Jul. 19, 12:57 AM • SA TranscriptsMolson Coors: Brewing Up A Comeback?TAP• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:43 PM • Benjamin Handler•12 CommentsCoty: What The Numbers SayCOTY• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:19 PM • Casacampo•3 CommentsVolkswagen Plans To Make Electric Cars Competitive On Price: Watch Out TeslaVLKAF, VLKAY, VLKPY• Tue, Jul. 18, 9:15 PM • Keith Williams•79 CommentsPepsi Vs. Hormel Foods: Which The Better Buy Here?HRL, PEP• Tue, Jul. 18, 5:15 PM • Peter F. Way, CFA•9 CommentsTesla In China: A Mega OpportunityTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:59 PM • Galileo Russell•109 CommentsTesla's Technological ChallengeTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:09 PM • David Pinsen•119 CommentsHarley-Davidson Is Getting HammeredHOG• Tue, Jul. 18, 3:04 PM • Quad 7 Capital•8 CommentsThe Tesla Freight Network: A $10 Billion OpportunityTSLA• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:44 PM • Trent Eady•236 CommentsTesla Competition: Volkswagen EditionTSLA, VLKAF, VLKAY• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:18 PM • ValueAnalyst•165 CommentsThis Is The Shakeup Procter & Gamble NeedsPG• Tue, Jul. 18, 12:00 PM • Josh Arnold•7 Comments123456...434Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Vodafone Group's (VOD) CEO Vittorio Colao on Q1 2018 Trading Update Conference Call (Transcript)


VOD•
      Sat, Jul. 22,  5:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Metso Corporation's (MXTOF) CEO Matti Kähkönen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MXTOF•
      Sat, Jul. 22, 12:08 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ingenico Group's (INGIF) CEO Philippe Lazare on Acquisition of Bambora & Q2 2017 Trading Update (Transcript)


INGIF•
      Fri, Jul. 21, 10:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Danske Bank's (DNSKF) CEO Thomas Borgen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DNSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cinedigm (CIDM) Cinedigm Bison Agreement Conference (Transcript)


CIDM•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Western Alliance Bancorporation's (WAL) CEO Robert Sarver on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WAL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  7:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Mobile Mini's (MINI) CEO Erik Olsson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MINI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Givaudan's (GVDNY) CEO Gilles Andrier on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GVDNY•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




MB Financial's (MBFI) CEO Mitchell Feiger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MBFI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cementos Pacasmayo's (CPAC) CEO Humberto Nadal on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPAC•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:35 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sensient Technologies' (SXT) CEO Paul Manning on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SXT•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moody's (MCO) CEO Raymond McDaniel on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCO•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  6:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Regions Financial's (RF) CEO Grayson Hall on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Accell Group (ACGPF) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACGPF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:52 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Del Frisco's Restaurant Group's (DFRG) CEO Norman Abdallah on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DFRG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  5:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Volaris Aviation's (VLRS) CEO Enrique Beltranena on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLRS•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:53 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Colgate-Palmolive's (CL) CEO Ian Cook on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CL•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



McClatchy's (MNI) CEO Craig Forman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MNI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:42 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Badger Meter's (BMI) CEO Rich Meeusen on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




OFG Bancorp's (OFG) CEO Jose Rafael Fernandez on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




General Electric's (GE) CEO Jeff Immelt on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GE•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:24 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•17 Comments 



Husky's (HUSKF) CEO Rob Peabody on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HUSKF•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:21 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Glacier Bancorp's (GBCI) CEO Randall Chesler on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GBCI•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:17 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Honeywell International's (HON) CEO Darius Adamczyk on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HON•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  4:15 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



CoBiz Financial's (COBZ) CEO Steve Bangert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


COBZ•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ameris Bancorp's (ABCB) CEO Edwin Hortman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ABCB•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:46 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Banco Latinoamericano De Comercio Exterior's (BLX) CEO Rubens Amaral On Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BLX•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:44 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Citizens Financial Group's (CFG) CEO Bruce Van Saun on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CFG•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Kansas City Southern's (KSU) CEO Patrick Ottensmeyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KSU•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  3:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Huntington Bancshares' (HBAN) CEO Steve Steinour on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HBAN•
      Fri, Jul. 21,  2:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•3 Comments 




123456...4430Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings










































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v



























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          




















Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





















